The Project Gutenberg EBook of War and Peace, by Leo Tolstoy
This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with almost
Title: War and Peace
Translators: Louise and Aylmer Maude
An Anonymous Volunteer, and David Widger
“Well, Prince, so Genoa and Lucca are now just family estates of the
if you still try to defend the infamies and horrors perpetrated by that
more to do with you and you are no longer my friend, no longer my
have frightened you—sit down and tell me all the news.”
It was in July, 1805, and the speaker was the well-known Anna Pávlovna
Schérer, maid of honor and favorite of the Empress Márya Fëdorovna.
rank and importance, who was the first to arrive at her reception. Anna
All her invitations without exception, written in French, and delivered
“If you have nothing better to do, Count (or Prince), and if the
I shall be very charmed to see you tonight between 7 and 10—Annette
embroidered court uniform, knee breeches, and shoes, and had stars on
his breast and a serene expression on his flat face. He spoke in that
refined French in which our grandfathers not only spoke but thought, and
who had grown old in society and at court. He went up to Anna Pávlovna,
kissed her hand, presenting to her his bald, scented, and shining head,
and complacently seated himself on the sofa.
politeness and affected sympathy of which indifference and even irony
festivities and fireworks are becoming wearisome.”
“Don’t tease! Well, and what has been decided about Novosíltsev’s
burnt his boats, and I believe that we are ready to burn ours.”
overflowed with animation and impulsiveness. To be an enthusiast had
become her social vocation and, sometimes even when she did not
“Oh, don’t speak to me of Austria. Perhaps I don’t understand
things, but Austria never has wished, and does not wish, for war. She
recognizes his high vocation and will be true to it. That is the one
thing I have faith in! Our good and wonderful sovereign has to perform
the noblest role on earth, and he is so virtuous and noble that God will
not forsake him. He will fulfill his vocation and crush the hydra of
this murderer and villain! We alone must avenge the blood of the just
one.... Whom, I ask you, can we rely on?... England with her commercial
spirit will not and cannot understand the Emperor Alexander’s
find, and still seeks, some secret motive in our actions. What answer
did Novosíltsev get? None. The English have not understood and cannot
understand the self-abnegation of our Emperor who wants nothing for
perform! Prussia has always declared that Buonaparte is invincible, and
neutrality is just a trap. I have faith only in God and the lofty
sister,” was all she said, in a dry and mournful tone.
expression of profound and sincere devotion and respect mingled with
sadness, and this occurred every time she mentioned her illustrious
beaucoup d’estime, and again her face clouded over with sadness.
The prince was silent and looked indifferent. But, with the womanly and
courtierlike quickness and tact habitual to her, Anna Pávlovna
recommended to the Empress) and at the same time to console him, so she
The prince bowed to signify his respect and gratitude.
to the prince and smiling amiably at him as if to show that political
and social topics were ended and the time had come for intimate
added in a tone admitting of no rejoinder and raising her eyebrows.
anyone, and so you don’t deserve to have them.”
I am dissatisfied with your younger son? Between ourselves” (and her
Majesty’s and you were pitied....”
a father could for their education, and they have both turned out fools.
more natural and animated than usual, so that the wrinkles round
his mouth very clearly revealed something unexpectedly coarse and
“I am your faithful slave and to you alone I can confess that my
asked. “They say old maids have a mania for matchmaking, and though I
Prince Vasíli did not reply, though, with the quickness of memory and
current of his thoughts, “that Anatole is costing me forty thousand
“Her father is very rich and stingy. He lives in the country. He is
the late Emperor, and was nicknamed ‘the King of Prussia.’ He is
very clever but eccentric, and a bore. The poor girl is very unhappy.
He is an aide-de-camp of Kutúzov’s and will be here tonight.”
Pávlovna’s hand and for some reason drawing it downwards. “Arrange
that affair for me and I shall always be your most devoted slave-slafe
and of good family and that’s all I want.”
And with the familiarity and easy grace peculiar to him, he raised the
maid of honor’s hand to his lips, kissed it, and swung it to and fro
Lise, young Bolkónski’s wife, this very evening, and perhaps the
and character but alike in the social circle to which they belonged.
father to the ambassador’s entertainment; she wore a ball dress and
She had been married during the previous winter, and being pregnant did
The Abbé Morio and many others had also come.
aunt,” or “You do not know my aunt?” and very gravely conducted
began to arrive; and slowly turning her eyes from the visitor to her
aunt, Anna Pávlovna mentioned each one’s name and then left them.
one of them knew, not one of them wanted to know, and not one of them
cared about; Anna Pávlovna observed these greetings with mournful and
solemn interest and silent approval. The aunt spoke to each of them in
the same words, about their health and her own, and the health of Her
with a sense of relief at having performed a vexatious duty and did not
but it lifted all the more sweetly, and was especially charming when she
upper lip and her half-open mouth—seemed to be her own special and
young woman, so soon to become a mother, so full of life and health, and
carrying her burden so lightly. Old men and dull dispirited young ones
who looked at her, after being in her company and talking to her a
and health. All who talked to her, and at each word saw her bright smile
and the constant gleam of her white teeth, thought that they were in a
steps, her workbag on her arm, and gaily spreading out her dress sat
pleasure to herself and to all around her. “I have brought my work,”
said she in French, displaying her bag and addressing all present.
a small reception, and just see how badly I am dressed.” And she
“You know,” said the princess in the same tone of voice and still in
French, turning to a general, “my husband is deserting me? He is going
added, addressing Prince Vasíli, and without waiting for an answer she
at that time, a very high ruffle, and a brown dress coat. This stout
grandee of Catherine’s time who now lay dying in Moscow. The young man
just returned from abroad where he had been educated, and this was his
this lowest-grade greeting, a look of anxiety and fear, as at the sight
of something too large and unsuited to the place, came over her face
the clever though shy, but observant and natural, expression which
“It is very good of you, Monsieur Pierre, to come and visit a poor
Pierre murmured something unintelligible, and continued to look round as
“Yes, I have heard of his scheme for perpetual peace, and it is very
and get away to attend to her duties as hostess. But Pierre now
she had finished speaking to him, and now he continued to speak to
another who wished to get away. With his head bent, and his big feet
resumed her duties as hostess and continued to listen and watch, ready
the foreman of a spinning mill, when he has set the hands to work, goes
round and notices here a spindle that has stopped or there one that
creaks or makes more noise than it should, and hastens to check the
drawing room, approaching now a silent, now a too-noisy group, and by a
proper, and regular motion. But amid these cares her anxiety about
the group round Mortemart to listen to what was being said there, and
Pierre had been educated abroad, and this reception at Anna
the intellectual lights of Petersburg were gathered there and, like a
and refined expression on the faces of those present he was always
Here the conversation seemed interesting and he stood waiting for an
steadily and ceaselessly on all sides. With the exception of the aunt,
Princess Hélène, Prince Vasíli’s daughter, and the little Princess
Bolkónskaya, very pretty and rosy, though rather too plump for her age.
The third group was gathered round Mortemart and Anna Pávlovna.
The vicomte was a nice-looking young man with soft features and polished
her guests, first the vicomte and then the abbé, as peculiarly choice
had perished by his own magnanimity, and that there were particular
The vicomte bowed and smiled courteously in token of his willingness to
to a third; and the vicomte was served up to the company in the choicest
and most advantageous style, like a well-garnished joint of roast beef
The vicomte wished to begin his story and gave a subtle smile.
and ivy, with a gleam of white shoulders, glossy hair, and sparkling
privilege of admiring her beautiful figure and shapely shoulders,
back, and bosom—which in the fashion of those days were very much
exposed—and she seemed to bring the glamour of a ballroom with her as
appeared shy of her unquestionable and all too victorious beauty. She
“How lovely!” said everyone who saw her; and the vicomte lifted his
shoulders and dropped his eyes as if startled by something extraordinary
when she took her seat opposite and beamed upon him also with her
The princess rested her bare round arm on a little table and considered
to time she smoothed the folds of her dress, and whenever the story
the expression she saw on the maid of honor’s face, and again relapsed
The little princess had also left the tea table and followed Hélène.
There was a general movement as the princess, smiling and talking
merrily to everyone at once, sat down and gaily arranged herself in her
“Now I am all right,” she said, and asking the vicomte to begin, she
Prince Hippolyte, having brought the workbag, joined the circle and
self-satisfied, youthful, and constant smile of animation, and by the
was dulled by imbecility and a constant expression of sullen
self-confidence, while his body was thin and weak. His eyes, nose, and
mouth all seemed puckered into a vacant, wearied grimace, and his arms
and legs always fell into unnatural positions.
the princess and hastily adjusting his lorgnette, as if without this
effrayée, as he called it, shoes, and silk stockings.
who also enjoyed the famous actress’ favors, and that in his presence
subject, and was thus at the duc’s mercy. The latter spared him, and
The story was very pretty and interesting, especially at the point
where the rivals suddenly recognized one another; and the ladies looked
her work as if to testify that the interest and fascination of the story
The vicomte appreciated this silent praise and smiling gratefully
talking too loudly and vehemently with the abbé, so she hurried to the
the balance of power, and the latter, evidently interested by the young
were talking and listening too eagerly and too naturally, which was why
“The means are ... the balance of power in Europe and the rights of
the maintenance of the balance of power of Europe, and it would save the
At that moment Anna Pávlovna came up and, looking severely at Pierre,
face instantly changed and assumed an offensively affected, sugary
“I am so enchanted by the brilliancy of the wit and culture of the
Not letting the abbé and Pierre escape, Anna Pávlovna, the more
Bolkónski, the little princess’ husband. He was a very handsome young
her with a grimace that distorted his handsome face, kissed Anna
Pávlovna’s hand, and screwing up his eyes scanned the whole company.
“General Kutúzov,” said Bolkónski, speaking French and stressing
“André,” said his wife, addressing her husband in the same
been telling us such a tale about Mademoiselle George and Buonaparte!”
Prince Andrew screwed up his eyes and turned away. Pierre, who from
affectionate eyes, now came up and took his arm. Before he looked round
unexpectedly kind and pleasant smile.
“No, impossible!” said Prince Andrew, laughing and pressing
Pierre’s hand to show that there was no need to ask the question. He
wished to say something more, but at that moment Prince Vasíli and his
daughter got up to go and the two young men rose to let them pass.
of a pleasure, and obliges me to interrupt you. I am very sorry to leave
holding up the folds of her dress, and the smile shone still more
In passing Prince Vasíli seized Pierre’s hand and said to Anna
a whole month and this is the first time I have seen him in society.
Anna Pávlovna smiled and promised to take Pierre in hand. She knew his
had been sitting with the old aunt rose hurriedly and overtook Prince
had left her kindly and tear-worn face and it now expressed only anxiety
and fear.
Although Prince Vasíli listened reluctantly and not very politely
ingratiating and appealing smile, and took his hand that he might not go
“What would it cost you to say a word to the Emperor, and then he
best families in Russia, but she was poor, and having long been out of
invitation to Anna Pávlovna’s reception and had sat listening to
embittered look clouded her once handsome face, but only for a moment;
then she smiled again and clutched Prince Vasíli’s arm more tightly.
for anything and I never will again, nor have I ever reminded you of my
do this for my son—and I shall always regard you as a benefactor,”
Golítsyn and he has refused. Be the kindhearted man you always were,”
beautiful head and looking over her classically molded shoulder as she
if it is to last. Prince Vasíli knew this, and having once realized
will not rest until they have gained their end, and are prepared if
necessary to go on insisting day after day and hour after hour, and even
“My dear Anna Mikháylovna,” said he with his usual familiarity and
ask; but to prove my devotion to you and how I respect your father’s
Guards. Here is my hand on it. Are you satisfied?”
rest, and then...”
since his appointment as Commander in Chief. He told me himself that
Apparently she had forgotten her age and by force of habit employed
group where the vicomte was still talking, and again pretended to
Milan?” asked Anna Pávlovna, “and of the comedy of the people of
Genoa and Lucca laying their petitions before Monsieur Buonaparte, and
Monsieur Buonaparte sitting on a throne and granting the petitions of
XVII, for the Queen, or for Madame Elizabeth? Nothing!” and he became
little princess, and having asked for a needle began tracing the Condé
far. By intrigues, violence, exile, and executions, French society—I
mean good French society—will have been forever destroyed, and
He shrugged his shoulders and spread out his hands. Pierre wished to
“The Emperor Alexander,” said she, with the melancholy which
their own form of government; and I believe that once free from the
“From what I have heard,” said Pierre, blushing and breaking into
It was evident that he did not like the vicomte and was aiming his
Napoleon’s words. “‘I opened my antechambers and they crowded
after the murder of the duc there was one martyr more in heaven and one
Before Anna Pávlovna and the others had time to smile their
conversation, and though Anna Pávlovna felt sure he would say something
“was a political necessity, and it seems to me that Napoleon
greatness of soul?” said the little princess, smiling and drawing her
“Capital!” said Prince Hippolyte in English, and began slapping his
knee with the palm of his hand.
audience over his spectacles and continued.
from the Revolution leaving the people to anarchy, and Napoleon alone
understood the Revolution and quelled it, and so for the general good,
“No,” cried he, becoming more and more eager, “Napoleon is great
preserved all that was good in it—equality of citizenship and freedom
of speech and of the press—and only for that reason did he obtain
rid them of the Bourbons and because they saw that he was a great
man. The Revolution was a grand thing!” continued Monsieur Pierre,
betraying by this desperate and provocative proposition his extreme
youth and his wish to express all that was in his mind.
“What? Revolution and regicide a grand thing?... Well, after that...
“Yes: ideas of robbery, murder, and regicide,” again interjected an
prejudices, and equality of citizenship, and all these ideas Napoleon
“Liberty and equality,” said the vicomte contemptuously, as if at
not love liberty and equality? Even our Saviour preached liberty and
vicomte and from the vicomte to their hostess. In the first moment of
had not exasperated the vicomte, and had convinced herself that it was
impossible to stop him, she rallied her forces and joined the vicomte in
innocent and untried?”
the 18th Brumaire; was not that an imposture? It was a swindle, and not
Pierre, not knowing whom to answer, looked at them all and smiled. His
between his acts as a private person, as a general, and as an emperor.
was great on the bridge of Arcola, and in the hospital at Jaffa where he
gave his hand to the plague-stricken; but ... but there are other acts
Pierre’s remarks, rose and made a sign to his wife that it was time to
and asking them all to be seated began:
“I was told a charming Moscow story today and must treat you to it.
Everyone waited, so emphatically and eagerly did he demand their
“There is in Moscow a lady, une dame, and she is very stingy. She must
have two footmen behind her carriage, and very big ones. That was her
livery, get up behind the carriage, and come with me while I make some
Here Prince Hippolyte spluttered and burst out laughing long before his
persons, among them the elderly lady and Anna Pávlovna, did however
“She went. Suddenly there was a great wind. The girl lost her hat and
longer and went on, between gasps of laughter: “And the whole world
it, or why it had to be told in Russian, still Anna Pávlovna and the
ending Pierre’s unpleasant and unamiable outburst. After the anecdote
and next balls, about theatricals, and who would meet whom, and when and
red hands; he did not know, as the saying is, how to enter a drawing
room and still less how to leave one; that is, how to say something
general’s three-cornered hat, and held it, pulling at the plume,
till the general asked him to restore it. All his absent-mindedness and
inability to enter a room and converse in it was, however, redeemed by
his kindly, simple, and modest expression. Anna Pávlovna turned toward
him and, with a Christian mildness that expressed forgiveness of his
indiscretion, nodded and said: “I hope to see you again, but I also
When she said this, he did not reply and only bowed, but again everybody
Prince Andrew had gone out into the hall, and, turning his shoulders
princess, and stared fixedly at her through his eyeglass.
contemplated between Anatole and the little princess’ sister-in-law.
“Write to her and let me know how her father looks at the matter. Au
revoir! ”—and she left the hall.
Prince Hippolyte approached the little princess and, bending his face
Two footmen, the princess’ and his own, stood holding a shawl and
understanding but not wishing to appear to do so. The princess as usual
spoke smilingly and listened with a laugh.
smiling joyfully; and snatching the shawl from the footman, whom he
Still smiling, she gracefully moved away, turning and glancing at her
husband. Prince Andrew’s eyes were closed, so weary and sleepy did he
reached to his very heels, and, stumbling in it, ran out into the porch
carriage, her husband was adjusting his saber; Prince Hippolyte, under
“I am expecting you, Pierre,” said the same voice, but gently and
nice indeed, quite French,” and he kissed the tips of his fingers.
continued the vicomte. “I pity the poor husband, that little officer
Hippolyte spluttered again, and amid his laughter said, “And you were
one quite at home, and from habit immediately lay down on the sofa, took
from the shelf the first book that came to his hand (it was Caesar’s
Commentaries), and resting on his elbow, began reading it in the middle.
hands.
face to Prince Andrew, smiled, and waved his hand.
and had remained away till he was twenty. When he returned to Moscow
his father dismissed the abbé and said to the young man, “Now go
to Petersburg, look round, and choose your profession. I will agree to
anything. Here is a letter to Prince Vasíli, and here is money. Write
to me all about it, and I will help you in everything.” Pierre had
already been choosing a career for three months, and had not decided
“No, I have not; but this is what I have been thinking and wanted
freedom I could understand it and should be the first to enter the army;
but to help England and Austria against the greatest man in the world is
Andrew shook himself as if waking up, and his face assumed the look it
dress as fresh and elegant as the other. Prince Andrew rose and politely
and fussily in the easy chair, “how is it Annette never got married?
“And I am still arguing with your husband. I can’t understand why he
understand it; I don’t in the least understand why men can’t live
the Emperor spoke to him most graciously. Annette and I were speaking of
Pierre looked at his friend and, noticing that he did not like the
she had spoken to Hippolyte in the drawing room and which was so plainly
must be broken off ... and then you know, André...” (she looked
significantly at her husband) “I’m afraid, I’m afraid!” she
whispered, and a shudder ran down her back.
Her husband looked at her as if surprised to notice that someone besides
Pierre and himself was in the room, and addressed her in a tone of
“What is it you are afraid of, Lise? I don’t understand,” said he.
of his own, goodness only knows why, he leaves me and locks me up alone
“With my father and sister, remember,” said Prince Andrew gently.
Her tone was now querulous and her lip drawn up, giving her not a
“I still can’t understand what you are afraid of,” said Prince
The princess blushed, and raised her arms with a gesture of despair.
Prince Andrew rose, shrugged his shoulders, and walked about the room.
Pierre looked over his spectacles with naïve surprise, now at him and
so to me? What have I done to you? You are going to the war and have no
an entreaty, a threat, and above all conviction that she would herself
Pierre, who had been growing more and more agitated as he listened to
all this, rose and approached the princess. He seemed unable to bear the
sight of tears and was ready to cry himself.
I myself have experienced ... and so ... because ... No, excuse me!
Prince Andrew caught him by the hand.
face changed into a winning and piteous look of fear. Her beautiful eyes
glanced askance at her husband’s face, and her own assumed the timid,
“Mon Dieu, mon Dieu!” she muttered, and lifting her dress with one
hand she went up to her husband and kissed him on the forehead.
“Good night, Lise,” said he, rising and courteously kissing her hand
with his small hand.
“Let us go and have supper,” he said with a sigh, going to the door.
They entered the elegant, newly decorated, and luxurious dining room.
Everything from the table napkins to the silver, china, and glass bore
Halfway through supper Prince Andrew leaned his elbows on the table and,
and suddenly determines to speak out.
and until you have ceased to love the woman of your choice and have seen
her plainly as she is, or else you will make a cruel and irrevocable
mistake. Marry when you are old and good for nothing—or all that is
good and noble in you will be lost. It will all be wasted on trifles.
room, where you will be ranged side by side with a court lackey and an
idiot!... But what’s the good?...” and he waved his arm.
Pierre took off his spectacles, which made his face seem different and
the good-natured expression still more apparent, and gazed at his friend
would I not give now to be unmarried! You are the first and only one to
who had lolled in Anna Pávlovna’s easy chairs and with half-closed
“You don’t understand why I say this,” he continued, “but it is
the whole story of life. You talk of Bonaparte and his career,” said
but his aim to consider, and he reached it. But tie yourself up with
a woman and, like a chained convict, you lose all freedom! And all you
have of hope and strength merely weighs you down and torments you with
regret. Drawing rooms, gossip, balls, vanity, and triviality—these are
the greatest war there ever was, and I know nothing and am fit for
nothing. I am very amiable and have a caustic wit,” continued Prince
Andrew, “and at Anna Pávlovna’s they listen to me. And that stupid
set without whom my wife cannot exist, and those women.... If you only
knew what those society women are, and women in general! My father is
consider yourself incapable and your life a spoiled life. You have
thought of his friend and how much he expected of him in the future.
highest degree just the very qualities Pierre lacked, and which might
and had an opinion about everything), but above all at his capacity for
work and study. And if Pierre was often struck by Andrew’s lack
Even in the best, most friendly and simplest relations of life, praise
and commendation are essential, just as grease is necessary to wheels
He suddenly blushed crimson, and it was plain that he had made a great
effort to say this. “Without a name and without means... And it
present I am free and am all right. Only I haven’t the least idea what
Prince Andrew looked kindly at him, yet his glance—friendly and
those Kurágins and leading that sort of life. It suits you so
badly—all this debauchery, dissipation, and the rest of it!”
“I don’t understand it,” replied Prince Andrew. “Women who are
women, ‘women and wine’ I don’t understand!”
Pierre was staying at Prince Vasíli Kurágin’s and sharing the
aches, and one spends all one’s money. He asked me for tonight, but I
enough to see a long way in the deserted street and it seemed more like
extraordinary may happen to one that honor and dishonor will be all the
all his decisions and intentions. He went to Kurágin’s.
and went in at the open door. There was no one in the anteroom; empty
bottles, cloaks, and overshoes were lying about; there was a smell of
alcohol, and sounds of voices and shouting in the distance.
Cards and supper were over, but the visitors had not yet dispersed.
Pierre threw off his cloak and entered the first room, in which were the
laughter, the shouting of familiar voices, the growling of a bear, and
pulling him by the chain and trying to set him at the others.
hands.”
“Jacob, bring a bottle!” shouted the host, a tall, handsome fellow
who stood in the midst of the group, without a coat, and with his fine
Dólokhov, an officer of the Semënov regiment, a notorious gambler and
“I don’t understand. What’s it all about?”
“Wait a bit, he is not drunk yet! A bottle here,” said Anatole, and
the tipsy guests who were again crowding round the window, and listening
“No, I won’t,” said Pierre, pushing Anatole aside, and he went up
Dólokhov was holding the Englishman’s hand and clearly and distinctly
Anatole and Pierre.
Dólokhov was of medium height, with curly hair and light-blue eyes. He
of the upper lip formed a sharp wedge and closed firmly on the firm
lower one, and something like two distinct smiles played continually
and no connections. Yet, though Anatole spent tens of thousands of
rubles, Dólokhov lived with him and had placed himself on such a
more than they did Anatole. Dólokhov could play all games and nearly
Both Kurágin and Dólokhov were at that time notorious among the rakes
and scapegraces of Petersburg.
were evidently flurried and intimidated by the directions and shouts of
Pierre seized the crossbeam, tugged, and wrenched the oak frame out with
of rum in his hand was approaching the window, from which the light of
Dólokhov, the bottle of rum still in his hand, jumped onto the window
sill. “Listen!” cried he, standing there and addressing those in the
understand him, but he did not speak it very well—“I bet fifty
spot” (he stooped and pointed to the sloping ledge outside the window)
“and without holding on to anything. Is that right?”
Anatole turned to the Englishman and taking him by one of the buttons
of his coat and looking down at him—the Englishman was short—began
understand?”
accept this challenge or not. Anatole did not release him, and though
sill, leaned over, and looked down.
Dólokhov climbed carefully and slowly through the window and lowered
on his seat, lowered his hands, moved a little to the right and then to
the left, and took up the bottle. Anatole brought two candles and
Dólokhov’s back in his white shirt, and his curly head, were lit
present, suddenly pushed forward with a scared and angry look and wanted
“Don’t touch him! You’ll startle him and then he’ll be killed.
Dólokhov turned round and, again holding on with both hands, arranged
Saying this he again turned round, dropped his hands, took the bottle
and lifted it to his lips, threw back his head, and raised his free hand
window and from Dólokhov’s back. Anatole stood erect with staring
who had wished to stop the affair ran to a corner of the room and threw
horror and fear. All were still. Pierre took his hands from his eyes.
further back till his curly hair touched his shirt collar, and the hand
holding the bottle was lifted higher and higher and trembled with the
effort. The bottle was emptying perceptibly and rising still higher
and his head tilting yet further back. “Why is it so long?” thought
Suddenly Dólokhov made a backward movement with his spine, and his arm
as he sat on the sloping ledge. As he began slipping down, his head and
arm wavered still more with the strain. One hand moved as if to clutch
his eyes and thought he would never open them again. Suddenly he was
aware of a stir all around. He looked up: Dólokhov was standing on the
The Englishman took out his purse and began counting out the money.
Dólokhov stood frowning and did not speak. Pierre jumped upon the
banging the table with a determined and drunken gesture and preparing to
bit and I’ll get round him.... Listen! I’ll take your bet tomorrow,
and began dancing round the room with it.
exception made, and Borís transferred into the regiment of Semënov
to Kutúzov’s staff despite all Anna Mikháylovna’s endeavors and
returned to Moscow and went straight to her rich relations, the
Rostóvs, with whom she stayed when in the town and where her darling
Bóry, who had only just entered a regiment of the line and was being
childhood and lived for years at a time. The Guards had already left
Petersburg on the tenth of August, and her son, who had remained in
It was St. Natalia’s day and the name day of two of the Rostóvs—the
mother and the youngest daughter—both named Nataly. Ever since
the morning, carriages with six horses had been coming and going
the Povarskáya, so well known to all Moscow. The countess herself and
her handsome eldest daughter were in the drawing room with the visitors
who came to congratulate, and who constantly succeeded one another in
A languor of motion and speech, resulting from weakness, gave her a
drawing room, helped to receive and entertain the visitors. The young
take part in receiving the visitors. The count met the guests and saw
called everyone without exception and without the slightest variation
rank—“I thank you for myself and for our two dear ones whose name
These words he repeated to everyone without exception or variation, and
same firm pressure of the hand and the same quick, repeated bows. As
still in the drawing room, drew a chair toward him or her, and jauntily
spreading out his legs and putting his hands on his knees with the air
of a man who enjoys life and knows how to live, he swayed to and
questions of health, sometimes in Russian and sometimes in very bad but
the fulfillment of duty, he rose to see some visitors off and, stroking
conservatory and pantry into the large marble dining hall, where tables
were being set out for eighty people; and looking at the footmen, who
were bringing in silver and china, moving tables, and unfolding damask
table linen, he would call Dmítri Vasílevich, a man of good family and
the manager of all his affairs, and while looking with pleasure at the
“Márya Lvóvna Karágina and her daughter!” announced the
room. The countess reflected a moment and took a pinch from a gold
snuffbox with her husband’s portrait on it.
“I’m quite worn out by these callers. However, I’ll see her and
A tall, stout, and proud-looking woman, with a round-faced smiling
at the Razumóvski’s ball ... and Countess Apráksina ... I was
interrupting one another and mingling with the rustling of dresses and
and say, “I am so delighted... Mamma’s health... and Countess
Apráksina...” and then, again rustling, pass into the anteroom, put
on cloaks or mantles, and drive away. The conversation was on the chief
topic of the day: the illness of the wealthy and celebrated beau of
Catherine’s day, Count Bezúkhov, and about his illegitimate son
such bad health, and now this vexation about his son is enough to kill
“Prince Vasíli’s son, he, and a certain Dólokhov have, it is said,
Dólokhov has been degraded to the ranks and Bezúkhov’s son sent
“They are regular brigands, especially Dólokhov,” replied the
put it in a carriage, and set off with it to visit some actresses! The
police tried to interfere, and what did the young men do? They tied
a policeman and the bear back to back and put the bear into the Moyka
well educated and clever. This is all that his foreign education has
The visitor made a gesture with her hand.
wishing to show her connections and knowledge of what went on in
“The fact of the matter is,” said she significantly, and also in a
“How handsome the old man still was only a year ago!” remarked the
countess. “I have never seen a handsomer man.”
count is very fond of Pierre, looked after his education, and wrote to
the Emperor about him; so that in the case of his death—and he is
so ill that he may die at any moment, and Dr. Lorrain has come from
or Prince Vasíli. Forty thousand serfs and millions of rubles! I know
and seeing that the elder visitor was not listening, he turned to the
well and, in particular, drinks well. “So do come and dine with us!”
now rose and took their leave. The visitor’s daughter was already
suddenly from the next room were heard the footsteps of boys and girls
running to the door and the noise of a chair falling over, and a girl
darted in and stopped short in the middle of the room. It was evident
of the Guards, a girl of fifteen, and a plump rosy-faced boy in a short
The count jumped up and, swaying from side to side, spread his arms wide
and threw them round the little girl who had run in.
husband.
childish bare shoulders which after her run heaved and shook her
in lace-frilled drawers, and feet in low slippers—was just at that
attention to her severe remark—and began to laugh. She laughed, and in
her mother and burst into such a loud, ringing fit of laughter that even
“Now then, go away and take your monstrosity with you,” said the
mother, pushing away her daughter with pretended sternness, and turning
glanced up at her through tears of laughter, and again hid her face.
son; Sónya, the count’s fifteen-year-old niece, and little Pétya,
his youngest boy, had all settled down in the drawing room and were
and mirth that shone in all their faces. Evidently in the back rooms,
been more amusing than the drawing room talk of society scandals, the
weather, and Countess Apráksina. Now and then they glanced at one
The two young men, the student and the officer, friends from childhood,
were of the same age and both handsome fellows, though not alike. Borís
was tall and fair, and his calm and handsome face had regular, delicate
features. Nicholas was short with curly hair and an open expression.
Dark hairs were already showing on his upper lip, and his whole face
expressed impetuosity and enthusiasm. Nicholas blushed when he entered
failed. Borís on the contrary at once found his footing, and related
quietly and humorously how he had known that doll Mimi when she was
during the five years he had known her, and how her head had cracked
She turned away from him and glanced at her younger brother, who was
screwing up his eyes and shaking with suppressed laughter, and unable
to control herself any longer, she jumped up and rushed from the room as
“Yes, yes, go and tell them to get it ready,” she answered,
Borís quietly left the room and went in search of Natásha. The plump
young lady visitor and the countess’ eldest daughter (who was four
years older than her sister and behaved already like a grown-up person),
were Nicholas and Sónya, the niece. Sónya was a slender little
lashes, thick black plaits coiling twice round her head, and a tawny
tint in her complexion and especially in the color of her slender but
graceful and muscular arms and neck. By the grace of her movements,
by the softness and flexibility of her small limbs, and by a certain
coyness and reserve of manner, she reminded one of a pretty, half-grown
upon anyone, and it was clear that the kitten had settled down only to
spring up with more energy and again play with her cousin as soon as
they too could, like Natásha and Borís, escape from the drawing room.
“Ah yes, my dear,” said the count, addressing the visitor and
pointing to Nicholas, “his friend Borís has become an officer, and
so for friendship’s sake he is leaving the university and me, his
old father, and entering the military service, my dear. And there was a
place and everything waiting for him in the Archives Department! Isn’t
“They’ve been saying so a long while,” said the count, “and
they’ll say so again and again, and that will be the end of it. My
up and turning away as if from a shameful aspersion. “It is not from
He glanced at his cousin and the young lady visitor; and they were both
today. He has been here on leave and is taking Nicholas back with him.
It can’t be helped!” said the count, shrugging his shoulders and
with the flirtatiousness of a handsome youth at Sónya and the young
to start her gambols again and display her kittenish nature.
rose from an ensign and became Emperor. Well, well, God grant it,” he
smile, and engaged the smiling Julie in a confidential conversation
of Sónya, who blushed and smiled unnaturally. In the midst of his talk
he glanced round at her. She gave him a passionately angry glance, and
hardly able to restrain her tears and maintain the artificial smile
on her lips, she got up and left the room. All Nicholas’ animation
vanished. He waited for the first pause in the conversation, and then
brought into the room had vanished; and as if answering a question no
one had put but which was always in her mind, “and how much suffering,
for girls and boys.”
have always, thank God, been my children’s friend and had their full
always be my daughters’ first confidante, and that if Nicholas, with
countess with a gentle smile, looking at Borís and went on, evidently
were to be severe with her and to forbid it ... goodness knows what they
me of her own accord in the evening and tell me everything. Perhaps I
“Yes, I was brought up quite differently,” remarked the handsome
on the contrary it gave her an unnatural, and therefore unpleasant,
learning, was well brought up, and had a pleasant voice; what she said
was true and appropriate, yet, strange to say, everyone—the visitors
and countess alike—turned to look at her as if wondering why she had
said it, and they all felt awkward.
“People are always too clever with their eldest children and try to
The guests got up and took their leave, promising to return to dinner.
conservatory. There she paused and stood listening to the conversation
growing impatient, and stamped her foot, ready to cry at his not coming
flower tubs and hid there.
dust from the sleeve of his uniform, and going up to a mirror examined
his handsome face. Natásha, very still, peered out from her ambush,
glass, smiled, and walked toward the other door. Natásha was about to
Hardly had Borís gone than Sónya, flushed, in tears, and muttering
to run out to her, and remained in her hiding place, watching—as
experiencing a new and peculiar pleasure. Sónya, muttering to herself,
kept looking round toward the drawing room door. It opened and Nicholas
“Well, if you do, so much the better, and you can go back to her!”
“Só-o-onya! Look here! How can you torture me and yourself like that,
for a mere fancy?” said Nicholas taking her hand.
Sónya did not pull it away, and left off crying. Natásha, not stirring
and scarcely breathing, watched from her ambush with sparkling eyes.
and kissed her.
“Oh, how nice,” thought Natásha; and when Sónya and Nicholas had
gone out of the conservatory she followed and called Borís to her.
“Borís, come here,” said she with a sly and significant look. “I
have something to tell you. Here, here!” and she led him into the
She grew confused, glanced round, and, seeing the doll she had thrown
Borís looked attentively and kindly at her eager face, but did not
“Don’t you want to? Well, then, come here,” said she, and
went further in among the plants and threw down the doll. “Closer,
She caught the young officer by his cuffs, and a look of solemnity and
glancing up at him from under her brows, smiling, and almost crying from
“How funny you are!” he said, bending down to her and blushing still
more, but he waited and did nothing.
that both her slender bare arms clasped him above his neck, and, tossing
and stood, hanging her head.
years ... then I will ask for your hand.”
A smile of joy and satisfaction lit up her eager face.
She took his arm and with a happy face went with him into the adjoining
Anna Mikháylovna looked at Véra and paused. The countess pressed her
friend’s hand.
The handsome Véra smiled contemptuously but did not seem at all hurt.
one pair at each window. She stopped and smiled scornfully. Sónya was
first he had ever written. Borís and Natásha were at the other window
and ceased talking when Véra entered. Sónya and Natásha looked at
It was pleasant and touching to see these little girls in love; but
have a room of your own,” and she took the inkstand from Nicholas.
replied, and the four simply looked at one another. She lingered in the
room with the inkstand in her hand.
“And at your age what secrets can there be between Natásha and
She seemed that day to be more than ever kind and affectionate to
“We don’t interfere with you and Berg.”
never understand it, because you’ve never loved anyone. You have no
heart! You are a Madame de Genlis and nothing more” (this nickname,
bestowed on Véra by Nicholas, was considered very stinging), “and
your greatest pleasure is to be unpleasant to people! Go and flirt with
unpleasant things to everyone and upset them. Let’s go to the
All four, like a flock of scared birds, got up and left the room.
The handsome Véra, who produced such an irritating and unpleasant
effect on everyone, smiled and, evidently unmoved by what had been
said to her, went to the looking glass and arranged her hair and scarf.
Looking at her own handsome face she seemed to become still colder and
last long? It’s all the Club and his easygoing nature. Even in the
country do we get any rest? Theatricals, hunting, and heaven knows what
ministers and great people, and know how to deal with them all! It’s
know what it is to be left a widow without means and with a son you love
big people I write a note: ‘Princess So-and-So desires an interview
with So and-So,’ and then I take a cab and go myself two, three, or
“Well, and to whom did you apply about Bóry?” asked the countess.
and put the matter before the Emperor,” said Princess Anna
Princess. I am at your command.’ Yes, he is a fine fellow and a very
dropping her voice. “My wretched lawsuit takes all I have and makes no
progress. Would you believe it, I have literally not a penny and don’t
know how to equip Borís.” She took out her handkerchief and began to
cry. “I need five hundred rubles, and have only one twenty-five-ruble
he is Bóry’s godfather—and allow him something for his maintenance,
The countess’ eyes filled with tears and she pondered in silence.
alone... that tremendous fortune... and what is his life worth? It’s a
burden to him, and Bóry’s life is only just beginning....”
“Heaven only knows, my dear! These rich grandees are so selfish.
Still, I will take Borís and go to see him at once, and I shall speak
princess rose. “It’s now two o’clock and you dine at four. There
time, Anna Mikháylovna sent someone to call her son, and went into the
door, and added in a whisper so that her son should not hear, “Wish me
count coming out from the dining hall into the anteroom, and he added:
house, you know, and danced with the children. Be sure to invite him, my
straw covered street and turned into the wide courtyard of Count Cyril
mother, drawing her hand from beneath her old mantle and laying
it timidly and tenderly on her son’s arm, “be affectionate and
all, and your future depends on him. Remember that, my dear, and be nice
it...” answered her son coldly. “But I have promised and will do it
Although the hall porter saw someone’s carriage standing at the
entrance, after scrutinizing the mother and son (who without asking to
rows of statues in niches) and looking significantly at the lady’s old
cloak, he asked whether they wanted the count or the princesses, and,
today, and that his excellency was not receiving anyone.
“My dear!” exclaimed his mother imploringly, again laying her hand
The hall porter sullenly pulled a bell that rang upstairs, and turned
to a footman dressed in knee breeches, shoes, and a swallow-tail coat,
who ran downstairs and looked over from the halfway landing.
Venetian mirror in the wall, and in her trodden-down shoes briskly
Just as the mother and son, having reached the middle of the hall, were
entered, the bronze handle of one of the doors turned and Prince Vasíli
swallowing his r’s, and pronouncing the Latin words with a French
Seeing Anna Mikháylovna and her son, Prince Vasíli dismissed the
doctor with a bow and approached them silently and with a look of
clouded his mother’s face, and he smiled slightly.
Prince Vasíli stared at her and at Borís questioningly and perplexed.
head and lips indicating very little hope for the patient.
Mikháylovna,” said Prince Vasíli, arranging his lace frill, and in
tone and manner, here in Moscow to Anna Mikháylovna whom he had placed
“Try to serve well and show yourself worthy,” added he, addressing
and respectfully that the prince gave him a searching glance.
“I never could understand how Nataly made up her mind to marry that
unlicked bear! A perfectly absurd and stupid fellow, and a gambler too,
and Borís. He is his godson,” she added, her tone suggesting that
Prince Vasíli became thoughtful and frowned. Anna Mikháylovna saw that
and hastened to reassure him.
“If it were not for my sincere affection and devotion to Uncle,”
said she, uttering the word with peculiar assurance and unconcern, “I
her head and continued in a whisper: “Has he performed his final duty,
worse, and it is absolutely necessary to prepare him if he is so ill.
We women, Prince,” and she smiled tenderly, “always know how to say
Evidently the prince understood her, and also understood, as he had done
A door of one of the inner rooms opened and one of the princesses, the
and am at your service to help you nurse my uncle. I imagine what you
have gone through,” and she sympathetically turned up her eyes.
The princess gave no reply and did not even smile, but left the room as
Anna Mikháylovna took off her gloves and, occupying the position she
and don’t forget to give him the Rostóvs’ invitation. They ask him
man.... Here he is, and the count has not once asked for him.”
stairs and up another, to Pierre’s rooms.
Petersburg, and had been expelled from there for riotous conduct and
for some days in Moscow and was staying as usual at his father’s
already known in Moscow and that the ladies about his father—who were
two younger ones were embroidering: both were rosy and pretty and they
The eldest princess paused in her reading and silently stared at him
while the youngest, the one with the mole, who was of a cheerful and
canvas and, scarcely able to refrain from laughing, stooped as if trying
“The count is suffering physically and mentally, and apparently you
him... Olga, go and see whether Uncle’s beef tea is ready—it is
almost time,” she added, giving Pierre to understand that they were
busy, and busy making his father comfortable, while evidently he,
Olga went out. Pierre stood looking at the sisters; then he bowed and
Next day Prince Vasíli had arrived and settled in the count’s house.
He sent for Pierre and said to him: “My dear fellow, if you are going
is all I have to say to you. The count is very, very ill, and you must
Since then Pierre had not been disturbed and had spent the whole time in
When Borís appeared at his door Pierre was pacing up and down his room,
as if running a sword through an invisible foe, and glaring savagely
over his spectacles, and then again resuming his walk, muttering
indistinct words, shrugging his shoulders and gesticulating.
“England is done for,” said he, scowling and pointing his finger
at someone unseen. “Mr. Pitt, as a traitor to the nation and to the
moment imagined himself to be Napoleon in person and to have just
effected the dangerous crossing of the Straits of Dover and captured
London—could pronounce Pitt’s sentence, he saw a well-built and
handsome young officer entering his room. Pierre paused. He had left
Moscow when Borís was a boy of fourteen, and had quite forgotten him,
but in his usual impulsive and hearty way he took Borís by the hand
it necessary to introduce himself, and without experiencing the least
“You are mistaken,” said Borís deliberately, with a bold and
Mikháylovna Drubetskáya. Rostóv, the father, is Ilyá, and his son is
Pierre shook his head and arms as if attacked by mosquitoes or bees.
papers and it was the first time he had heard Villeneuve’s name.
“We here in Moscow are more occupied with dinner parties and scandal
nothing about it and have not thought about it. Moscow is chiefly busy
with gossip,” he continued. “Just now they are talking about you and
But Borís spoke distinctly, clearly, and dryly, looking straight into
“But I just wish to say, to avoid misunderstandings, that you are
your father is rich, I don’t regard myself as a relation of his, and
For a long time Pierre could not understand, but when he did, he jumped
way, and, blushing far more than Borís, began to speak with a feeling
of mingled shame and vexation.
And Borís, having apparently relieved himself of an onerous duty and
extricated himself from an awkward situation and placed another in it,
were children. You might think that I... I understand, quite understand.
acquainted,” and he pressed Borís’ hand. “Do you know, I have not
Pierre saw that Borís wished to change the subject, and being of the
same mind he began explaining the advantages and disadvantages of the
and warmly pressing his hand looked affectionately over his spectacles
into Borís’ eyes. After he had gone Pierre continued pacing up and
intelligent, and resolute young man.
life, he felt an unaccountable tenderness for this young man and made up
Prince Vasíli saw the princess off. She held a handkerchief to her eyes
and her face was tearful.
may I shall do my duty. I will come and spend the night. He must not be
“I don’t understand, Mamma—what is his attitude to Pierre?”
“Ah, my dear! He is so rich, and we are so poor!”
alone applying her handkerchief to her eyes. At last she rang.
The countess was upset by her friend’s sorrow and humiliating poverty,
and was therefore out of sorts, a state of mind which with her always
found expression in calling her maid “my dear” and speaking to her
have, my dear! I tasted it. The thousand rubles I paid for Tarás were
He sat down by his wife, his elbows on his knees and his hands ruffling
“What are your commands, little countess?”
“Oh, little countess!” ... and the count began bustling to get out
“I want a great deal, Count! I want five hundred rubles,” and taking
out her cambric handkerchief she began wiping her husband’s waistcoat.
house and now managed all his affairs, stepped softly into the room.
bring me such tattered and dirty notes as last time, but nice clean ones
the count was beginning to breathe heavily and quickly which was always
count, and having kissed his wife’s hand he went back to his study.
in clean notes, was lying ready under a handkerchief on the countess’
little table, and Anna Mikháylovna noticed that something was agitating
ill! I was only there a few moments and hardly said a word...”
elderly face, and she took the money from under the handkerchief.
Anna Mikháylovna instantly guessed her intention and stooped to be
Anna Mikháylovna was already embracing her and weeping. The countess
wept too. They wept because they were friends, and because they were
kindhearted, and because they—friends from childhood—had to think
about such a base thing as money, and because their youth was over....
Countess Rostóva, with her daughters and a large number of guests, was
his study and showed them his choice collection of Turkish pipes. From
common sense and frank plainness of speech. Márya Dmítrievna was known
to the Imperial family as well as to all Moscow and Petersburg, and both
cities wondered at her, laughed privately at her rudenesses, and told
respected and feared her.
of the war that had been announced in a manifesto, and about the
smoking and talking. He neither smoked nor talked, but bending his head
first to one side and then to the other watched the smokers with evident
pleasure and listened to the conversation of his two neighbors, whom he
One of them was a sallow, clean-shaven civilian with a thin and wrinkled
young man. He sat with his legs up on the sofa as if quite at home and,
smoke spasmodically and screwing up his eyes. This was an old bachelor,
irreproachably washed, brushed, and buttoned, held his pipe in the
middle of his mouth and with red lips gently inhaled the smoke, letting
it escape from his handsome mouth in rings. This was Lieutenant Berg, an
the army, and about whom Natásha had teased her elder sister Véra,
speaking of Berg as her “intended.” The count sat between them and
said Shinshín, laughing ironically and mixing the most ordinary Russian
Berg always spoke quietly, politely, and with great precision. His
and silent when the talk related to any topic that had no direct bearing
circumstantially and with evident satisfaction.
with the rank of lieutenant; but as it is I receive two hundred and
thirty,” said he, looking at Shinshín and the count with a joyful,
I shall be in a more prominent position,” continued Berg, “and
what can be done with two hundred and thirty rubles! I even manage to
put a little aside and to send something to my father,” he went on,
of his mouth and winking at the count.
the company commander might get killed and he, as senior in the company,
the regiment, and how satisfied his father was with him. Berg evidently
enjoyed narrating all this, and did not seem to suspect that others,
sedate, and the naïveté of his youthful egotism was so obvious, that
shoulder and taking his feet off the sofa.
conversation but think it necessary to move about and talk, in order
to show that they are not at all impatient for their food. The host and
hostess look toward the door, and now and then glance at one another,
and the visitors try to guess from these glances who, or what, they are
Pierre had come just at dinnertime and was sitting awkwardly in the
search of somebody and answered all her questions in monosyllables. He
was in the way and was the only one who did not notice the fact. Most of
“You have not yet seen my husband?”
understood that she was being asked to entertain this young man, and
on all sides. The countess rose and went into the ballroom.
“Herself,” came the answer in a rough voice, and Márya Dmítrievna
All the unmarried ladies and even the married ones except the very
oldest rose. Márya Dmítrievna paused at the door. Tall and stout,
surveying the guests, and leisurely arranged her wide sleeves as if
“Health and happiness to her whose name day we are keeping and to her
who was kissing her hand, “you’re feeling dull in Moscow, I daresay?
see how these nestlings are growing up,” and she pointed to the girls.
“You must look for husbands for them whether you like it or not....”
always called Natásha a Cossack) and she stroked the child’s arm as
she came up fearless and gay to kiss her hand. “I know she’s a scamp
She took a pair of pear-shaped ruby earrings from her huge reticule and,
of her saint’s-day fete, turned away at once and addressed herself to
tone of voice. “Come here, my friend...” and she ominously tucked
your father the truth when he was in favor, and in your case it’s my
and he amuses himself setting a policeman astride a bear! For shame,
She turned away and gave her hand to the count, who could hardly keep
whole dining hall, and last of all the children, tutors, and governesses
band struck up in the gallery, and the guests settled down in their
places. Then the strains of the count’s household band were replaced
by the clatter of knives and forks, the voices of visitors, and the
Márya Dmítrievna on her right and Anna Mikháylovna on her left, the
with the hussar colonel on his left and Shinshín and the other male
grown-up young people: Véra beside Berg, and Pierre beside Borís; and
on the other side, the children, tutors, and governesses. From behind
the crystal decanters and fruit vases, the count kept glancing at his
wife and her tall cap with its light-blue ribbons, and busily filled
behind the pineapples at her husband whose face and bald head seemed
men’s end the voices sounded louder and louder, especially that of the
colonel of hussars who, growing more and more flushed, ate and drank so
guests were and exchanging glances with Natásha, who was sitting
opposite. Pierre spoke little but examined the new faces, and ate a
great deal. Of the two soups he chose turtle with savory patties and
napkin, from behind the next man’s shoulders and whispered: “Dry
that stood before his plate, Pierre held out one at random and drank
thirteen look at the boy they are in love with and have just kissed for
the first time. Sometimes that same look fell on Pierre, and that funny
pale, now blushed and strained every nerve to overhear what Nicholas
and Julie were saying to one another. The governess kept looking round
and kinds of dessert, in order to send a full description of the dinner
to his people in Germany; and he felt greatly offended when the butler
no one would understand that it was not to quench his thirst or from
At the men’s end of the table the talk grew more and more animated.
in Petersburg and that a copy, which he had himself seen, had that day
been forwarded by courier to the commander in chief.
Shinshín. “He has stopped Austria’s cackle and I fear it will be
the service and patriotically Russian. He resented Shinshín’s remark.
vreatening Russia and zat ze safety and dignity of ze Empire as vell
... and the wish, which constitutes the Emperor’s sole and absolute
him to despatch part of the army abroad and to create a new condition
wine with dignity and looking to the count for approval.
turn spindles at home!’?” said Shinshín, puckering his brows and
what he was about; yet they beat him à plate couture,*(3) and where
are we to find Suvórovs now? Je vous demande un peu,” *(4) said he,
thumping the table; “and ve must tie for our Emperor, and zen all vill
again turning to the count. “Zat is how ve old hussars look at it, and
zere’s an end of it! And how do you, a young man and a young hussar,
eyes and ears intent on the colonel.
his plate round and moving his wineglasses about with as much decision
and desperation as though he were at that moment facing some great
that his remarks were too enthusiastic and emphatic for the occasion and
Sónya trembled all over and blushed to her ears and behind them and
down to her neck and shoulders while Nicholas was speaking.
Pierre listened to the colonel’s speech and nodded approvingly.
table. “What are you thumping the table for?” she demanded of the
hussar, “and why are you exciting yourself? Do you think the French
in God’s hands. You may die in your bed or God may spare you in a
and the men’s at the other.
Her face suddenly flushed with reckless and joyous resolution. She half
was coming, and turning to her mother:
sternly with a threatening and forbidding movement of her head.
“Mamma! What sweets are we going to have?” and Natásha’s voice
sounded still more firm and resolute.
Sónya and fat little Pétya doubled up with laughter.
and to Pierre, glancing at him again.
Natásha saw there was nothing to be afraid of and so she braved even
Márya Dmítrievna and the countess burst out laughing, and all the
but at the incredible boldness and smartness of this little girl who had
pineapple ice. Before the ices, champagne was served round. The band
again struck up, the count and countess kissed, and the guests, leaving
their seats, went up to “congratulate” the countess, and reached
across the table to clink glasses with the count, with the children, and
with one another. Again the footmen rushed about, chairs scraped, and
guests returned to the drawing room and to the count’s study.
The card tables were drawn out, sets made up for boston, and the
dropping into his usual after-dinner nap, and laughed at everything.
clavichord and harp. Julie by general request played first. After she
other young ladies in begging Natásha and Nicholas, who were noted for
She looked round and seeing that her friend was not in the room ran to
Running into Sónya’s room and not finding her there, Natásha ran to
dress under her, hiding her face with her slender fingers, and sobbing
changed: her eyes became fixed, and then a shiver passed down her broad
neck and the corners of her mouth drooped.
Natásha’s large mouth widened, making her look quite ugly, and she
crying. Sónya tried to lift her head to answer but could not, and
blue-striped feather bed and hugging her friend. With an effort Sónya
sat up and began wiping her eyes and explaining.
come... he told me himself... but still I should not cry,” and she
showed a paper she held in her hand—with the verses Nicholas had
understand... what a soul he has!”
“It’s all very well for you... I am not envious... I love you and
one would have to... the Metropolitan himself... and even then it
the countess as her mother and called her so) “that I am spoiling
Nicholas’ career and am heartless and ungrateful, while truly... God
is my witness,” and she made the sign of the cross, “I love her so
much, and all of you, only Véra... And what for? What have I done
Sónya could not continue, and again hid her face in her hands and in
“Yes, these verses Nicholas wrote himself and I copied some others,
and she found them on my table and said she’d show them to Mamma, and
that I was ungrateful, and that Mamma would never allow him to marry
her up, hugged her, and, smiling through her tears, began comforting
remember how we and Nicholas, all three of us, talked in the sitting
arranged and how nice it all was? There’s Uncle Shinshín’s brother
it. And he is so clever and so good!” said Natásha. “Don’t
you cry, Sónya, dear love, darling Sónya!” and she kissed her and
and she won’t say anything to Mamma. Nicholas will tell her himself,
and he doesn’t care at all for Julie.”
Sónya sat up. The little kitten brightened, its eyes shone, and it
seemed ready to lift its tail, jump down on its soft paws, and begin
frock and hair.
“Well, let’s go and sing ‘The Brook.’”
Sónya, shaking off some down which clung to her and tucking away the
and light, joyous steps. At the visitors’ request the young people
     How sweet, as fancies wander free,
get ready to dance in the large hall, and the sound of the feet and the
Natásha came in and walking straight up to Pierre said, laughing and
While the couples were arranging themselves and the musicians tuning up,
sitting in a conspicuous place and talking to him like a grown-up lady.
She had a fan in her hand that one of the ladies had given her to hold.
Assuming quite the pose of a society woman (heaven knows when and where
she had learned it) she talked with her partner, fanning herself and
Natásha blushed and laughed.
pushed back in the sitting room where the count and Márya Dmítrievna
had been playing cards with the majority of the more distinguished and
and replacing their purses and pocketbooks, entered the ballroom. First
came Márya Dmítrievna and the count, both with merry countenances. The
gallantry lit up his face and as soon as the last figure of the
écossaise was ended, he clapped his hands to the musicians and shouted
“Look at Papa!” shouted Natásha to the whole company, and quite
curly head to her knees and made the whole room ring with her laughter.
jovial old gentleman, who standing beside his tall and stout partner,
shoulders, turned out his toes, tapped gently with his foot, and, by
a smile that broadened his round face more and more, prepared the
filled by the domestic serfs—the men on one side and the women on
The count danced well and knew it. But his partner could not and did not
hanging down (she had handed her reticule to the countess), and only her
stern but handsome face really joined in the dance. What was expressed
expression only in her more and more beaming face and quivering nose.
But if the count, getting more and more into the swing of it, charmed
the spectators by the unexpectedness of his adroit maneuvers and
her foot—which everyone appreciated in view of her size and habitual
severity. The dance grew livelier and livelier. The other couples could
not attract a moment’s attention to their own evolutions and did not
even try to do so. All were watching the count and Márya Dmítrievna.
and shouted to the musicians to play faster. Faster, faster, and faster;
lightly, more lightly, and yet more lightly whirled the count, flying
and making a wide sweep with his arm, amid a thunder of applause and
and wiping their faces with their cambric handkerchiefs.
her sleeves and puffing heavily.
to a tune in which the weary musicians blundered, and while tired
footmen and cooks were getting the supper, Count Bezúkhov had a
made for the sacrament of unction, and in his house there was the bustle
and thrill of suspense usual at such moments. Outside the house, beyond
that evening to bid a last farewell to the celebrated grandee of
bows and trying to escape as quickly as possible from the glances fixed
on him by the doctors, clergy, and relatives of the family. Prince
Vasíli, who had grown thinner and paler during the last few days,
leaning his elbow on his knee and covering his face with his hand. After
sitting so for a while he rose, and, looking about him with frightened
whispers, and, whenever anyone went into or came from the dying man’s
room, grew silent and gazed with eyes full of curiosity or expectancy at
“The limits of human life ... are fixed and may not be
beside him and was listening naïvely to his words.
his hand over the thin grizzled strands of hair combed back across his
“Yes, and he is over sixty. I hear the count no longer recognizes
from weeping and sat down beside Dr. Lorrain, who was sitting in a
weather. “The weather is beautiful, Princess; and besides, in Moscow
“Take a glass of boiled water and put a pinch of cream of tartar,”
and he indicated with his delicate fingers what he meant by a pinch.
“Tonight, not later,” said he in a low voice, and he moved away
understand and state the patient’s condition.
the icons and there was a pleasant scent of flowers and burnt pastilles.
cupboards, and little tables. The quilt of a high, white feather bed was
She rose and smoothed her hair, which was as usual so extremely smooth
that it seemed to be made of one piece with her head and covered with
unchanging stonily severe expression; and, sitting down opposite the
“Well, my dear?” said Prince Vasíli, taking her hand and bending it
prominent gray eyes. Then she shook her head and glanced up at the icons
and devotion, or of weariness and hope of resting before long. Prince
Prince Vasíli said no more and his cheeks began to twitch nervously,
too seemed strange; at one moment they looked impudently sly and at the
hands, looked attentively into Prince Vasíli’s eyes evidently
“Well, you see, my dear princess and cousin, Catherine Semënovna,”
The princess continued to look at him without moving, and with the same
her. “You know, Catiche, that we—you three sisters, Mámontov, and
me; but, my dear, I am getting on for sixty and must be prepared for
his portrait, “definitely demanded that he should be called.”
replied, “and it is that He would be merciful to him and would allow
rubbing his bald head and angrily pulling back toward him the little
table and becoming more animated and talking more rapidly: “what if
Pierre’s legitimation? Do you understand that in consideration of the
“I can tell you more,” continued Prince Vasíli, seizing her hand,
“that letter was written, though it was not sent, and the Emperor knew
as soon as all is over,” and Prince Vasíli sighed to intimate what he
meant by the words all is over, “and the count’s papers are opened,
the will and letter will be delivered to the Emperor, and the petition
legal heir to everything and you won’t get anything. You must know,
my dear, whether the will and letter were written, and whether they have
ought to know where they are, and must find them, because...”
“What next?” the princess interrupted, smiling sardonically and not
changing the expression of her eyes. “I am a woman, and you think we
“Well, really, Catiche! Can’t you understand! You are so
and will then inherit everything under the will? And if the will and
and you, mon cousin, seem to consider me a perfect fool,” said the
saying something witty and stinging.
tell you for the tenth time that if the letter to the Emperor and the
girl, you and your sisters are not heiresses! If you don’t believe me,
(the family solicitor) “and he says the same.”
her thin lips grew white, though her eyes did not change, and her voice
and I don’t now.”
She pushed the little dog off her lap and smoothed her dress.
nothing but meanness, deceit, envy, intrigue, and ingratitude—the
“Yes, I was a fool! I still believed in people, loved them, and
The princess wished to rise, but the prince held her by the hand. She
all done casually in a moment of anger, of illness, and was afterwards
last moments by not letting him commit this injustice, and not to let
has to be cunning and cruel.”
and wish you to have as good an opinion of me. Don’t upset yourself,
and let us talk sensibly while there is still time, be it a day or be it
but an hour.... Tell me all you know about the will, and above all where
it is. You must know. We will take it at once and show it to the
count. He has, no doubt, forgotten it and will wish to destroy it.
You understand that my sole desire is conscientiously to carry out his
and you.”
“Ah, don’t talk to me! Last winter she wheedled herself in here and
Sophie—I can’t repeat them—that it made the count quite ill and he
While these conversations were going on in the reception room and the
and Anna Mikháylovna (who found it necessary to accompany him) was
he was asleep in his corner and woke him up. Rousing himself, Pierre
followed Anna Mikháylovna out of the carriage, and only then began
looked like tradespeople, ran hurriedly from the entrance and hid in the
to be all right,” Pierre concluded, and followed Anna Mikháylovna.
of assurance and haste, Pierre concluded that it was all absolutely
clattering. These men pressed close to the wall to let Pierre and Anna
Mikháylovna pass and did not evince the least surprise at seeing them
the landing. “I’d better go to my own room.”
Anna Mikháylovna paused and waited for him to come up.
Pierre did not understand a word, but the conviction that all this had
to be grew stronger, and he meekly followed Anna Mikháylovna who was
in this part of the house and did not even know of the existence of
with a decanter on a tray as “my dear” and “my sweet,” asked
about the princess’ health and then led Pierre along a stone passage.
in the house was done in haste at that time), and Pierre and Anna
Prince Vasíli and the eldest princess were sitting close together
impatience, while the princess jumped up and with a gesture of
This action was so unlike her usual composure and the fear depicted on
stopped and glanced inquiringly over his spectacles at his guide. Anna
Mikháylovna evinced no surprise, she only smiled faintly and sighed, as
reply to his look, and went still faster along the passage.
Pierre could not make out what it was all about, and still less what
approach, but even in this room there now stood an empty bath, and water
and by a servant who passed out on tiptoe without heeding them. They
windows opening into the conservatory, with its large bust and full
another. All became silent and turned to look at the pale tear-worn Anna
Mikháylovna as she entered, and at the big stout figure of Pierre who,
glance at all those in the room and noticing the count’s confessor
seeming to grow suddenly smaller, and respectfully received the blessing
first of one and then of another priest.
The doctor cast a rapid glance upwards and silently shrugged his
shoulders and eyes, almost closing the latter, sighed, and moved away
from the doctor to Pierre. To him, in a particularly respectful and
“Trust in His mercy!” and pointing out a small sofa for him to sit
and wait for her, she went silently toward the door that everyone was
watching and it creaked very slightly as she disappeared behind it.
with something more than curiosity and sympathy. He noticed that they
of awe and even servility. A deference such as he had never before
the priests, rose and offered him her seat; an aide-de-camp picked up
and returned a glove Pierre had dropped; the doctors became respectfully
silent as he passed by, and moved to make way for him. At first Pierre
wished to take another seat so as not to trouble the lady, and also to
pick up the glove himself and to pass round the doctors who were not
even in his way; but all at once he felt that this would not do, and
rite which everyone expected of him, and that he was therefore bound
aide-de-camp, and sat down in the lady’s chair, placing his huge hands
and decided in his own mind that all was as it should be, and that in
order not to lose his head and do foolish things he must not act on his
his eyes seemed larger than usual when he glanced round and noticed
Pierre. He went up to him, took his hand (a thing he never used to do),
and drew it downwards as if wishing to ascertain whether it was firmly
well!” and he turned to go.
But Pierre thought it necessary to ask: “How is...” and hesitated,
in perplexity, and only later grasped that a stroke was an attack of
illness. Prince Vasíli said something to Lorrain in passing and went
through the door on tiptoe. He could not walk well on tiptoe and his
whole body jerked at each step. The eldest princess followed him, and
the priests and deacons and some servants also went in at the door.
Through that door was heard a noise of things being moved about, and
resolute in the discharge of duty, ran out and touching Pierre lightly
Pierre went in at the door, stepping on the soft carpet, and noticed
that the strange lady, the aide-de-camp, and some of the servants, all
Pierre well knew this large room divided by columns and an arch, its
columns, with a high silk-curtained mahogany bedstead on one side and
the gleaming icons stood a long invalid chair, and in that chair
hair above his broad forehead which reminded one of a lion, and the deep
characteristically noble wrinkles of his handsome, ruddy face. He lay
just under the icons; his large thick hands outside the quilt. Into the
right hand, which was lying palm downwards, a wax taper had been thrust
between forefinger and thumb, and an old servant, bending over from
with lighted tapers in their hands, slowly and solemnly conducting the
handkerchiefs to their eyes, and just in front of them their eldest
sister, Catiche, with a vicious and determined look steadily fixed on
sorrowful, and all-forgiving expression on her face, stood by the door
invalid chair, a wax taper in his left hand, was leaning his left arm on
and was crossing himself with his right hand, turning his eyes upward
and resignation to the will of God. “If you do not understand these
Behind him stood the aide-de-camp, the doctors, and the menservants;
the men and women had separated as in church. All were silently crossing
themselves, and the reading of the church service, the subdued chanting
of deep bass voices, and in the intervals sighs and the shuffling of
was about, went across the room to where Pierre was standing and gave
him a taper. He lit it and, distracted by observing those around him,
began crossing himself with the hand that held the taper.
watched him. She smiled, hid her face in her handkerchief, and remained
with it hidden for awhile; then looking up and seeing Pierre she
to one another, and the old servant who was holding the count’s hand
got up and said something to the ladies. Anna Mikháylovna stepped
forward and, stooping over the dying man, beckoned to Lorrain from
importance of the rite now being performed and even approved of it. He
hand that was free, and turning sideways felt the pulse and reflected
stir around him, then the people resumed their places and the service
left the chair on which he had been leaning, and—with an air
which intimated that he knew what he was about and if others did not
understand him it was so much the worse for them—did not go up to the
dying man, but passed by him, joined the eldest princess, and moved
silken hangings. On leaving the bed both Prince Vasíli and the princess
The chanting of the service ceased, and the voice of the priest was
sacrament. The dying man lay as lifeless and immovable as before. Around
him everyone began to stir: steps were audible and whispers, among which
The sick man was so surrounded by doctors, princesses, and servants
they had lifted the dying man and were moving him.
Here!” exclaimed different voices; and the heavy breathing of the
bearers and the shuffling of their feet grew more hurried, as if the
he caught a momentary glimpse between their heads and backs of the dying
man’s high, stout, uncovered chest and powerful shoulders, raised by
those who were holding him under the armpits, and of his gray, curly,
leonine head. This head, with its remarkably broad brow and cheekbones,
its handsome, sensual mouth, and its cold, majestic expression, was
movements of the bearers, and the cold listless gaze fixed itself upon
hand and said, “Come.” Pierre went with her to the bed on which the
hands were symmetrically placed on the green silk quilt, the palms
not knowing what to do, and glanced inquiringly at his guide. Anna
man’s hand and moving her lips as if to send it a kiss. Pierre,
suggestion and pressed his lips to the large boned, fleshy hand. Neither
the hand nor a single muscle of the count’s face stirred. Once more
distressed that his stout and clumsy body took up so much room and doing
father and son. This lasted about two minutes, which to Pierre seemed an
hour. Suddenly the broad muscles and lines of the count’s face began
to twitch. The twitching increased, the handsome mouth was drawn to one
side (only now did Pierre realize how near death his father was), and
quilt. The eyes and face of the sick man showed impatience. He made an
“Wants to turn on the other side,” whispered the servant, and got up
helplessly and he made a fruitless effort to pull it forward. Whether he
face, and again at the arm, and on his face a feeble, piteous smile
quivering in his breast and a tickling in his nose, and tears dimmed his
There was now no one in the reception room except Prince Vasíli and the
Great and talking eagerly. As soon as they saw Pierre and his companion
they became silent, and Pierre thought he saw the princess hide
Vasíli to Anna Mikháylovna. “Go and take something, my poor Anna
handleless cup before a table on which tea and a cold supper were laid
and little tables. During balls given at the house Pierre, who did not
who, as they passed through in their ball dresses with diamonds and
this same room was dimly lighted by two candles. On one small table tea
things and supper dishes stood in disorder, and in the middle of the
whispering, and betraying by every word and movement that they none
of them forgot what was happening and what was about to happen in the
liked to. He looked inquiringly at his monitress and saw that she was
Vasíli and the eldest princess. Pierre concluded that this also was
essential, and after a short interval followed her. Anna Mikháylovna
was standing beside the princess, and they were both speaking in excited
“Permit me, Princess, to know what is necessary and what is not
“But, my dear princess,” answered Anna Mikháylovna blandly but
impressively, blocking the way to the bedroom and preventing the other
the two ladies, addressing Prince Vasíli and pointing to an inlaid
portfolio she held in her hand. “All I know is that his real will is
in his writing table, and this is a paper he has forgotten....”
“Dear princess, I beg and implore you, have some pity on him! Je vous
of its honeyed firmness and softness.
loud that those in the drawing room heard her and were startled. “Why
Intriguer!” she hissed viciously, and tugged with all her might at the
portfolio, and changed her grip.
Prince Vasíli rose. “Oh!” said he with reproach and surprise,
and ask him, I!... does that satisfy you?”
which had lost all dignity, and at the twitching cheeks of Prince
Mikháylovna and snatching the portfolio from her.
Prince Vasíli bent his head and spread out his hands.
and which had always opened so quietly, burst noisily open and banged
against the wall, and the second of the three sisters rushed out
wringing her hands.
“What are you doing!” she cried vehemently. “He is dying and you
caught up the object of contention and ran into the bedroom. The eldest
princess and Prince Vasíli, recovering themselves, followed her. A few
handkerchief and rushed from the room.
sitting and dropped onto it, covering his face with his hand. Pierre
noticed that he was pale and that his jaw quivered and shook as if in an
“Ah, my friend!” said he, taking Pierre by the elbow; and there was
in his voice a sincerity and weakness Pierre had never observed in it
before. “How often we sin, how much we deceive, and all for what? I am
awful...” and he burst into tears.
She led him into the dark drawing room and Pierre was glad no one could
see his face. Anna Mikháylovna left him, and when she returned he was
But God will support you: you are young, and are now, I hope, in command
duties on you, and you must be a man.”
Pierre understood nothing of all this and coloring shyly looked in
Mikháylovna returned to the Rostóvs’ and went to bed. On waking in
the morning she told the Rostóvs and all her acquaintances the details
to the last meeting between father and son, it was so touching that she
could not think of it without tears, and did not know which had behaved
everything and everybody at last and had spoken such pathetic words to
soul to see such men as the old count and his worthy son,” said she.
Of the behavior of the eldest princess and Prince Vasíli she spoke
disapprovingly, but in whispers and as a great secret.
arrival of young Prince Andrew and his wife was daily expected, but
with his daughter, Princess Mary, and her companion, Mademoiselle
Bald Hills, while he himself needed no one and nothing. He used to
say that there are only two sources of human vice—idleness and
superstition, and only two virtues—activity and intelligence. He
himself undertook his daughter’s education, and to develop these two
cardinal virtues in her gave her lessons in algebra and geometry
till she was twenty, and arranged her life so that her whole time was
and not only at the same hour but at the same minute. With those about
him, from his daughter to his serfs, the prince was sharp and invariably
and respect as few hardhearted men would have aroused. Although he was
in retirement and had now no influence in political affairs, every high
considered it his duty to visit him and waited in the lofty antechamber
antechamber experienced the same feeling of respect and even fear when
the enormously high study door opened and showed the figure of a rather
small old man, with powdered wig, small withered hands, and bushy gray
morning greeting, crossing herself with trepidation and repeating a
silent prayer. Every morning she came in like that, and every morning
quietly and said in a whisper: “Please walk in.”
opened the door which moved noiselessly and easily. She paused at the
entrance. The prince was working at the lathe and after glancing round
The large table covered with books and plans, the tall glass-fronted
standing up, on which lay an open exercise book, and the lathe with
tools laid ready to hand and shavings scattered around—all indicated
continuous, varied, and orderly activity. The motion of the small foot
shod in a Tartar boot embroidered with silver, and the firm pressure
of the lean sinewy hand, showed that the prince still possessed the
tenacious endurance and vigor of hardy old age. After a few more turns
dropped it into a leather pouch attached to the lathe, and, approaching
so he simply held out his bristly cheek (as yet unshaven) and, regarding
her tenderly and attentively, said severely:
containing lessons in geometry written by himself and drew up a chair
“For tomorrow!” said he, quickly finding the page and making a
taking a letter addressed in a woman’s hand from a bag hanging above
princess’ face. She took it quickly and bent her head over it.
and a timid smile.
more and holding out the letter.
the letter away, and leaning his elbows on the table he drew toward him
daughter and placing an arm on the back of the chair on which she sat,
old age and tobacco, which she had known so long. “Now, madam, these
close to her; the red patches on her face came and went, and it was
plain that she understood nothing and was so frightened that her
fear would prevent her understanding any of her father’s further
the princess’ eyes grew dim, she could not see and could not hear
close to her, of his breath and the smell of him, and could think only
sitting noisily backward and forward, made efforts to control himself
and not become vehement, but almost always did become vehement, scolded,
and sometimes flung the exercise book away.
aside and turning sharply away; but rising immediately, he paced up and
down, lightly touched his daughter’s hair and sat down again.
He drew up his chair, and continued to explain.
Mary, having taken and closed the exercise book with the next day’s
I don’t want to have you like our silly ladies. Get used to it and
you’ll like it,” and he patted her cheek. “It will drive all the
She turned to go, but he stopped her with a gesture and took an uncut
He patted her on the shoulder and himself closed the door after her.
rarely left her and which made her plain, sickly face yet plainer. She
sat down at her writing table, on which stood miniature portraits and
which was littered with books and papers. The princess was as untidy as
her father was tidy. She put down the geometry book and eagerly broke
Dear and precious Friend, How terrible and frightful a thing is
separation! Though I tell myself that half my life and half my happiness
are wrapped up in you, and that in spite of the distance separating us
fate and in spite of the pleasures and distractions around me I cannot
calm, and penetrating, a look I loved so well and seem to see before me
Having read thus far, Princess Mary sighed and glanced into the mirror
which stood on her right. It reflected a weak, ungraceful figure and
princess, turning away and continuing to read. But Julie did not flatter
her friend, the princess’ eyes—large, deep and luminous (it seemed
to the frontier. Our dear Emperor has left Petersburg and it is thought
inactive and has left the university to join the army. I will confess to
last summer, is so noble-minded and full of that real youthfulness which
one seldom finds nowadays among our old men of twenty and, particularly,
he is so frank and has so much heart. He is so pure and poetic that
Someday I will tell you about our parting and all that was said then.
these poignant joys and sorrows. You are fortunate, for the latter are
this poetic and pure intimacy, were what my heart needed. But enough of
old Count Bezúkhov, and his inheritance. Fancy! The three princesses
have received very little, Prince Vasíli nothing, and it is Monsieur
Pierre who has inherited all the property and has besides been
recognized as legitimate; so that he is now Count Bezúkhov and
Vasíli played a very despicable part in this affair and that he
I confess I understand very little about all these matters of wills and
to know as plain Monsieur Pierre, has become Count Bezúkhov and the
watch the change in the tone and manners of the mammas burdened by
marriageable daughters, and of the young ladies themselves, toward
him, though, between you and me, he always seemed to me a poor sort
by finding husbands for me (most of whom I don’t even know), the
Bezúkhova. But you will understand that I have no desire for the post.
someone rich and distinguée, and it is on you that his relations’
handsome and a terrible scapegrace. That is all I have been able to find
But enough of gossip. I am at the end of my second sheet of paper, and
Mamma has sent for me to go and dine at the Apráksins’. Read the
is an admirable book which calms and elevates the soul. Adieu! Give
my respects to monsieur your father and my compliments to Mademoiselle
P.S. Let me have news of your brother and his charming little wife.
The princess pondered awhile with a thoughtful smile and her luminous
rose and with her heavy tread went up to the table. She took a sheet of
paper and her hand moved rapidly over it. This is the reply she wrote,
Dear and precious Friend, Your letter of the 13th has given me great
man? On such matters I am only severe with myself. I understand such
feelings in others, and if never having felt them I cannot approve of
sweeter, and better than the feelings which the beautiful eyes of a
young man can inspire in a romantic and loving young girl like yourself.
and my father was much affected by it. He says the count was the last
representative but one of the great century, and that it is his own
seemed to me to have an excellent heart, and that is the quality I value
most in people. As to his inheritance and the part played by Prince
So young, and burdened with such riches—to what temptations he will be
poorer than the poorest beggar. A thousand thanks, dear friend, for the
volume you have sent me and which has such success in Moscow. Yet since
weak human understanding cannot grasp, it seems to me rather useless to
spend time in reading what is unintelligible and can therefore bear
no fruit. I never could understand the fondness some people have for
their doubts and excite their imagination, giving them a bent for
the Epistles and Gospels. Let us not seek to penetrate what mysteries
terrible and holy secrets of Providence while we remain in this flesh
which forms an impenetrable veil between us and the Eternal? Let us
conform to them and follow them, and let us be persuaded that the less
rejects all knowledge that does not come from Him; and the less we seek
has received a letter and is expecting a visit from Prince Vasíli. In
the duties of wife and mother upon me I shall try to perform them as
toward him whom He may give me for husband.
are—at the heart of affairs and of the world—is the talk all of
war, even here amid fieldwork and the calm of nature—which townsfolk
and painfully felt. My father talks of nothing but marches and
countermarches, things of which I understand nothing; and the day
people and starting to join the army. You should have seen the state of
the mothers, wives, and children of the men who were going and should
laws of its divine Saviour, Who preached love and forgiveness of
injuries—and that men attribute the greatest merit to skill in killing
Adieu, dear and kind friend; may our divine Saviour and His most Holy
Mother keep you in their holy and all-powerful care!
Bourienne rapidly, in her pleasant mellow tones and with guttural r’s.
She brought into Princess Mary’s strenuous, mournful, and gloomy
world a quite different atmosphere, careless, lighthearted, and
“Princess, I must warn you,” she added, lowering her voice and
evidently listening to herself with pleasure, and speaking with
him and would not have others do so.”
The princess glanced at her watch and, seeing that she was five minutes
room with a look of alarm. Between twelve and two o’clock, as the
day was mapped out, the prince rested and the princess played the
Just then a closed carriage and another with a hood drove up to the
alight, and let her pass into the house before him. Old Tíkhon, wearing
a whisper that the prince was sleeping, and hastily closed the door.
was at home last, and, having assured himself that they had not, he
and her short, downy, smiling lip lifted when she began to speak just as
merrily and prettily as ever.
“Why, this is a palace!” she said to her husband, looking around
Tíkhon, at her husband, and at the footman who accompanied them.
“Is that Mary practicing? Let’s go quietly and take her by
who kissed his hand.
of the oft-repeated passage of the sonata. Prince Andrew stopped and
middle, a cry was heard, then Princess Mary’s heavy tread and the
hand to her heart, with a beatific smile and obviously equally ready to
cry or to laugh. Prince Andrew shrugged his shoulders and frowned, as
of one another, and then, as if afraid of being too late, seized each
other’s hands, kissing them and pulling them away, and again began
kissing each other on the face, and then to Prince Andrew’s surprise
both began to cry and kissed again. Mademoiselle Bourienne also began to
it seemed quite natural that they should cry, and apparently it never
“Ah! my dear!... Ah! Mary!...” they suddenly exclaimed, and then
Prince Andrew and his sister, hand in hand, kissed one another, and
turned toward her brother, and through her tears the loving, warm,
continually and rapidly touching her rosy nether lip when necessary
and drawing up again next moment when her face broke into a smile of
glittering teeth and sparkling eyes. She told of an accident they had
condition, and immediately after that informed them that she had left
all her clothes in Petersburg and that heaven knew what she would have
to dress in here; and that Andrew had quite changed, and that Kitty
Odýntsova had married an old man, and that there was a suitor for Mary,
still looking silently at her brother and her beautiful eyes were full
of love and sadness. It was plain that she was following a train of
“Yes, and even tomorrow,” replied her brother.
The face of the little princess changed. She sighed and said: “Yes,
and unexpectedly again began to cry.
Lise? Take her to your room and I’ll go to Father. How is he? Just the
showed that, in spite of all his love and respect for his father, he was
“The hours are the same, and the lathe, and also the mathematics and
When the twenty minutes had elapsed and the time had come for the old
style, wearing an antique coat and powdered hair; and when Prince Andrew
entered his father’s dressing room (not with the contemptuous look and
thick, bushy eyebrows. Prince Andrew went up and kissed his father on
topic—making fun of the military men of the day, and more particularly
“Yes, Father, I have come to you and brought my wife who is
father’s face with an eager and respectful look. “How is your
“Only fools and rakes fall ill, my boy. You know me: I am busy from
morning till night and abstemious, so of course I am well.”
loving and honoring him. “Why, I have not yet had time to settle
see whether it was firmly plaited, and grasping his by the hand. “The
house for your wife is ready. Princess Mary will take her there and
show her over, and they’ll talk nineteen to the dozen. That’s
their woman’s way! I am glad to have her. Sit down and talk. About
Mikhelson’s army I understand—Tolstóy ‘s too... a simultaneous
chair and pacing up and down the room followed by Tíkhon, who ran after
him, handing him different articles of clothing. “What of Sweden? How
reluctantly, but gradually with more and more animation, and from habit
ninety thousand strong, was to threaten Prussia so as to bring her out
of her neutrality and draw her into the war; how part of that army was
to join some Swedish forces at Stralsund; how two hundred and twenty
thousand Austrians, with a hundred thousand Russians, were to operate in
Italy and on the Rhine; how fifty thousand Russians and as many English
were to land at Naples, and how a total force of five hundred thousand
not listening to it continued to dress while walking about, and three
This meant that Tíkhon was not handing him the waistcoat he wanted.
“And will she soon be confined?” and shaking his head reproachfully
“Malbrook s’en va-t-en guerre. Dieu sait quand reviendra.” *
“Well, you’ve told me nothing new,” and the old man repeated,
meditatively and rapidly:
“Dieu sait quand reviendra. Go to the dining room.”
At the appointed hour the prince, powdered and shaven, entered the
dining room where his daughter-in-law, Princess Mary, and Mademoiselle
very strictly to social distinctions and rarely admitted even important
checked handkerchief) to illustrate the theory that all men are equals,
and had more than once impressed on his daughter that Michael Ivánovich
exceedingly lofty, the members of the household and the footmen—one
signs to the footmen, and anxiously glancing from the clock to the door
portrait (evidently by the hand of the artist belonging to the estate)
of a ruling prince, in a crown—an alleged descendant of Rúrik and
Princess Mary looked at her brother in surprise. She did not understand
reverence and was beyond question.
Princess Mary could not understand the boldness of her brother’s
criticism and was about to reply, when the expected footsteps were heard
coming from the study. The prince walked in quickly and jauntily as was
struck two and another with a shrill tone joined in from the drawing
their thick, bushy eyebrows sternly scanned all present and rested on
sensation of fear and respect which the old man inspired in all around
him. He stroked her hair and then patted her awkwardly on the back of
her eyes, and then quickly went to his place and sat down. “Sit down,
and not with his eyes.
silent and seemed confused. The prince asked her about her father, and
she began to smile and talk. He asked about mutual acquaintances, and
she became still more animated and chattered away giving him greetings
from various people and retelling the town gossip.
“Countess Apráksina, poor thing, has lost her husband and she has
cried her eyes out,” she said, growing more and more lively.
As she became animated the prince looked at her more and more sternly,
and suddenly, as if he had studied her sufficiently and had formed a
definite idea of her, he turned away and addressed Michael Ivánovich.
telling me what forces are being collected against him! While you and I
Michael Ivánovich did not at all know when “you and I” had said
such things about Bonaparte, but understanding that he was wanted as
And the conversation again turned on the war, on Bonaparte, and the
generals and statesmen of the day. The old prince seemed convinced not
A B C of war or of politics, and that Bonaparte was an insignificant
that there were no political difficulties in Europe and no real war,
father’s ridicule of the new men, and drew him on and listened to him
himself fall into a trap Moreau set him, and from which he did not know
Consider, Prince Andrew. Two... Frederick and Suvórov; Moreau!...
Moreau would have been a prisoner if Suvórov had had a free hand; but
he had the Hofs-kriegs-wurst-schnapps-Rath on his hands. It would have
“you and your generals won’t get on against Buonaparte; you’ll
Were the Potëmkins, Suvórovs, and Orlóvs Germans? No, lad, either you
commander among them! Hm!...”
him, Bonaparte had made in his campaigns and even in politics. His
listened, refraining from a reply, and involuntarily wondered how this
old man, living alone in the country for so many years, could know and
discuss so minutely and acutely all the recent European military and
“You think I’m an old man and don’t understand the present state
sleep at night. Come now, where has this great commander of yours shown
“Dieu sait quand reviendra.” hummed the prince out of tune and, with
The little princess during the whole discussion and the rest of
father-in-law and now at Princess Mary. When they left the table she
took her sister-in-law’s arm and drew her into another room.
After inspecting the carriage himself and seeing the trunks put in, he
with silver plate, two Turkish pistols and a saber—a present from
clean, and in cloth covers carefully tied with tapes.
one reviews the past and plans for the future. Prince Andrew’s face
looked very thoughtful and tender. With his hands behind him he paced
and thoughtfully shaking his head. Did he fear going to the war, or was
hurriedly unclasped his hands, stopped at a table as if tying the
cover of the small box, and assumed his usual tranquil and impenetrable
had apparently been running), “and I did so wish to have another talk
obviously strange to her to think that this stern handsome man should be
Prince Andrew was silent, but the princess noticed the ironical and
Andrew? Don’t forget that she has grown up and been educated in
society, and so her position now is not a rosy one. We should enter into
to be parted from her husband and be left alone in the country, in her
     * To understand all is to forgive all.
think we thoroughly understand.
“You live in the country and don’t think the life terrible,” he
life, and can’t, for I know no other. But think, Andrew: for a young
life, all alone—for Papa is always busy, and I... well, you know what
“No? She is very nice and kind and, above all, she’s much to be
and she’s even in my way. You know I always was a savage, and now am
even more so. I like being alone.... Father likes her very much. She and
Michael Ivánovich are the two people to whom he is always gentle and
after losing her own father. She is very good-natured, and my father
likes her way of reading. She reads to him in the evenings and reads
Princess Mary was first surprised and then aghast at this question.
“He always was rather harsh; and now I should think he’s getting
thoughts rather than the trend of the conversation—“and that’s a
contented and happy with him. I only wish you were all as happy as I
understand how a man of his immense intellect can fail to see what is
as clear as day, and can go so far astray. That is the only thing
improvement. His satire has been less bitter of late, and there was a
monk he received and had a long talk with.”
“Ah! my dear, I am afraid you and your monk are wasting your
“Ah! mon ami, I only pray, and hope that God will hear me.
and is nothing unworthy of you, but it will comfort me. Promise,
Andrúsha!...” said she, putting her hand in her reticule but not yet
the subject of her request and must not be shown before the request was
grandfather, wore it in all his wars.” (She still did not take out
“Andrew, I bless you with this icon and you must promise me you will
“If it does not weigh a hundredweight and won’t break my neck...
repented and added: “I am glad; really, dear, I am very glad.”
“Against your will He will save and have mercy on you and bring you
to Himself, for in Him alone is truth and peace,” said she in a voice
trembling with emotion, solemnly holding up in both hands before her
She crossed herself, kissed the icon, and handed it to Andrew.
up the whole of her thin, sickly face and made it beautiful. Her brother
crossed himself and kissed the icon. There was a look of tenderness, for
“Thank you, my dear.” She kissed him on the forehead and sat down
“As I was saying to you, Andrew, be kind and generous as you always
sweet, so good-natured, and her position now is a very hard one.”
Red patches appeared on Princess Mary’s face and she was silent as if
The patches grew deeper on her forehead, neck, and cheeks. She tried to
princess had been crying after dinner and had spoken of her forebodings
about her confinement, and how she dreaded it, and had complained of her
fate, her father-in-law, and her husband. After crying she had fallen
“Know this, Másha: I can’t reproach, have not reproached, and never
shall reproach my wife with anything, and I cannot reproach myself
with anything in regard to her; and that always will be so in whatever
As he said this he rose, went to his sister, and, stooping, kissed
her forehead. His fine eyes lit up with a thoughtful, kindly, and
“Let us go to her, I must say good-by. Or—go and wake and I’ll
take these away. Put this on the seat and this to the right.”
Princess Mary rose and moved to the door, then stopped and said:
“Andrew, if you had faith you would have turned to God and asked Him
to give you the love you do not feel, and your prayer would have been
sweetly. It was the third time that day that, with an ecstatic and
blushing and dropping her eyes.
Prince Andrew looked sternly at her and an expression of anger suddenly
and hair, without looking at her eyes, with such contempt that the
Frenchwoman blushed and went away without a word. When he reached his
sister’s room his wife was already awake and her merry voice, hurrying
usual in French, and as if after long self-restraint she wished to make
“No, but imagine the old Countess Zúbova, with false curls and her
This very sentence about Countess Zúbova and this same laugh Prince
five times. He entered the room softly. The little princess, plump and
rosy, was sitting in an easy chair with her work in her hands, talking
incessantly, repeating Petersburg reminiscences and even phrases. Prince
Andrew came up, stroked her hair, and asked if she felt rested after
their journey. She answered him and continued her chatter.
Mary, and the little princess. Prince Andrew had been called to his
spectacles and white dressing gown, in which he received no one but his
“Kiss me here,” and he touched his cheek: “Thanks, thanks!”
“For not dilly-dallying and not hanging to a woman’s apron strings.
writing, so that his quill spluttered and squeaked. “If you have
hands....”
The old prince stopped writing and, as if not understanding, fixed his
cases only one goes wrong, but it is her fancy and mine. They have been
telling her things. She has had a dream and is frightened.”
He signed with a flourish and suddenly turning to his son began to
“The wife!” said the old prince, briefly and significantly.
“I don’t understand!” said Prince Andrew.
He seized his son by the hand with small bony fingers, shook it, looked
through him, and again laughed his frigid laugh.
old man continued to fold and seal his letter, snatching up and throwing
down the wax, the seal, and the paper, with his accustomed rapidity.
Andrew did not speak; he was both pleased and displeased that his father
understood him. The old man got up and gave the letter to his son.
I have written that he should make use of you in proper places and not
and like him. Write and tell me how he receives you. If he is all
was accustomed to understand him. He led him to the desk, raised the
lid, drew out a drawer, and took out an exercise book filled with his
bold, tall, close handwriting.
hand them to the Emperor after my death. Now here is a Lombard bond
and a letter; it is a premium for the man who writes a history of
“Well, now, good-by!” He gave his son his hand to kiss, and embraced
your old father...” he paused unexpectedly, and then in a querulous
killed and if I have a son, do not let him be taken away from you—as I
“Not let the wife have him?” said the old man, and laughed.
at the door Prince Andrew and the figure of the old man in a white
dressing gown, spectacled and wigless, shouting in an angry voice.
Prince Andrew sighed and made no reply.
“Andrew, already!” said the little princess, turning pale and
looking with dismay at her husband.
He embraced her. She screamed and fell unconscious on his shoulder.
and carefully placed her in an easy chair.
“Adieu, Mary,” said he gently to his sister, taking her by the hand
and kissing her, and then he left the room with rapid steps.
Andrew had gone and made the sign of the cross in his direction. From
door opened quickly and the stern figure of the old man in the white
“Gone? That’s all right!” said he; and looking angrily at the
unconscious little princess, he shook his head reprovingly and slammed
In October, 1805, a Russian army was occupying the villages and towns of
the Archduchy of Austria, and yet other regiments freshly arriving from
Russia were settling near the fortress of Braunau and burdening the
the commander in chief, Kutúzov.
by the commander in chief. Despite the un-Russian appearance of the
locality and surroundings—fruit gardens, stone fences, tiled roofs,
and hills in the distance—and despite the fact that the inhabitants
the commander in chief would inspect the regiment on the march. Though
the words of the order were not clear to the regimental commander, and
not, it was decided at a consultation between the battalion commanders
soldiers, after a twenty-mile march, were kept mending and cleaning all
night long without closing their eyes, while the adjutants and
company commanders calculated and reckoned, and by morning the
thousand men each of whom knew his place and his duty, had every button
and every strap in place, and shone with cleanliness. And not only
externally was all in order, but had it pleased the commander in chief
shirt, and in every knapsack the appointed number of articles, “awl,
soap, and all,” as the soldiers say. There was only one circumstance
this defect was not due to any fault of the regimental commander, for
in spite of repeated demands boots had not been issued by the Austrian
commissariat, and the regiment had marched some seven hundred miles.
The commander of the regiment was an elderly, choleric, stout, and
thick-set general with grizzled eyebrows and whiskers, and wider from
chest to back than across the shoulders. He had on a brand-new uniform
showing the creases where it had been folded and thick gold epaulettes
which seemed to stand rather than lie down on his massive shoulders. He
his life. He walked about in front of the line and at every step pulled
himself up, slightly arching his back. It was plain that the commander
admired his regiment, rejoiced in it, and that his whole mind was
matters, social interests and the fair sex occupied no small part of his
battalion commanders who smilingly pressed forward (it was plain that
they both felt happy). “We had our hands full last night. However, I
The battalion commander perceived the jovial irony and laughed.
“What?” asked the commander.
clearly worded the day before, namely, that the commander in chief
the march: in their greatcoats, and packs, and without any preparation
before with proposals and demands for him to join up with the army of
the Archduke Ferdinand and Mack, and Kutúzov, not considering this
so the worse the condition it was in, the better pleased the commander
men should be in their greatcoats and in marching order, and that the
commander in chief would otherwise be dissatisfied. On hearing this the
regimental commander hung his head, silently shrugged his shoulders, and
the battalion commander. “Oh, my God!” he added, stepping resolutely
forward. “Company commanders!” he shouted in a voice accustomed to
command. “Sergeants major!... How soon will he be here?” he asked
The regimental commander, going up to the line himself, ordered the
soldiers to change into their greatcoats. The company commanders ran off
were not in very good condition), and instantly the squares that had up
to then been in regular order and silent began to sway and stretch and
hum with voices. On all sides soldiers were running to and fro, throwing
up their knapsacks with a jerk of their shoulders and pulling the straps
over their heads, unstrapping their overcoats and drawing the sleeves on
instead of black. The regimental commander walked with his jerky steps
to the front of the regiment and examined it from a distance.
“Whatever is this? This!” he shouted and stood still. “Commander
“Commander of the third company wanted by the general!... commander to
the general... third company to the commander.” The words passed along
the lines and an adjutant ran to look for the missing officer.
appeared from behind his company and, though he was a middle-aged man
and not in the habit of running, trotted awkwardly stumbling on his
intemperance, and his mouth twitched nervously. The general looked the
captain up and down as he came up panting, slackening his pace as he
shouted the regimental commander, thrusting forward his jaw and pointing
The commander in chief is expected and you leave your place? Eh? I’ll
The commander of the company, with his eyes fixed on his superior,
pressed two fingers more and more rigidly to his cap, as if in this
Hungarian?” said the commander with an austere gibe.
regimental commander cooling down a little. “Leave indeed.... One says
a word to you and you... What?” he added with renewed irritation, “I
And the commander, turning to look at the adjutant, directed his jerky
anger and walking up to the regiment wished to find a further excuse for
“H-o-o-w are you standing? Where’s your leg? Your leg?” shouted
the commander with a tone of suffering in his voice, while there were
still five men between him and Dólokhov with his bluish-gray uniform.
The eyes of the general and the soldier met. The general became silent,
The regimental commander, flushing, ran to his horse, seized the stirrup
with trembling hands, threw his body across the saddle, righted himself,
drew his saber, and with a happy and resolute countenance, opening
preening its plumage and became motionless.
“Att-ention!” shouted the regimental commander in a soul-shaking
voice which expressed joy for himself, severity for the regiment, and
light blue Viennese calèche, slightly creaking on its springs and drawn
and a convoy of Croats. Beside Kutúzov sat an Austrian general, in
calèche stopped in front of the regiment. Kutúzov and the Austrian
general were talking in low voices and Kutúzov smiled slightly as
thousand men breathlessly gazing at him and the regimental commander did
The word of command rang out, and again the regiment quivered, as with a
feeble voice of the commander in chief was heard. The regiment roared,
“Health to your ex... len... len... lency!” and again all became
and the general in white, accompanied by the suite, walked between the
From the way the regimental commander saluted the commander in chief and
devoured him with his eyes, drawing himself up obsequiously, and from
and hardly able to restrain his jerky movements, and from the way he
darted forward at every word or gesture of the commander in chief,
greater zeal than his duty as a commander. Thanks to the strictness and
assiduity of its commander the regiment, in comparison with others that
were only 217 sick and stragglers. Everything was in good order except
noticing what a bad state of things it was. The regimental commander
commander in chief’s regarding the regiment. Behind Kutúzov, at a
and sometimes laughed. Nearest of all to the commander in chief walked
a handsome adjutant. This was Prince Bolkónski. Beside him was his
kindly, smiling, handsome face and moist eyes. Nesvítski could hardly
beside him. This hussar, with a grave face and without a smile or a
commander’s back and mimicked his every movement. Each time the
commander started and bent forward, the hussar started and bent forward
in exactly the same manner. Nesvítski laughed and nudged the others to
Kutúzov walked slowly and languidly past thousands of eyes which were
been reprimanded on account of the blue greatcoat.
more than Timókhin had done when he was reprimanded by the regimental
commander, but now that the commander in chief addressed him he drew
it had the commander in chief continued to look at him, and so Kutúzov,
who evidently understood his case and wished him nothing but good,
scarred and puffy face.
satisfied with him?” he asked the regimental commander.
officer as in a looking glass—started, moved forward, and answered:
“We all have our weaknesses,” said Kutúzov smiling and walking away
The regimental commander was afraid he might be blamed for this and did
captain and his drawn-in stomach, and mimicked his expression and pose
and while Kutúzov was turning managed to make a grimace and then assume
a most serious, deferential, and innocent expression.
The third company was the last, and Kutúzov pondered, apparently trying
suite and said in French:
up to the commander in chief, and presented arms.
duty. The Emperor is gracious, and I shan’t forget you if you deserve
The clear blue eyes looked at the commander in chief just as boldly as
they had looked at the regimental commander, seeming by their expression
to tear open the veil of convention that separates a commander in chief
and prove my devotion to His Majesty the Emperor and to Russia!”
him and everything he could say had long been known to him, that he was
weary of it and it was not at all what he wanted. He turned away and
quarters near Braunau, where they hoped to receive boots and clothes and
regimental commander, overtaking the third company on its way to its
quarters and riding up to Captain Timókhin who was walking in front.
(The regimental commander’s face now that the inspection was happily
pleased!” And he held out his hand to the captain.
behaving himself, and in general...”
“And what about his character?” asked the regimental commander.
day he is sensible, well educated, and good-natured, and the next he’s
a wild beast.... In Poland, if you please, he nearly killed a Jew.”
“Oh, well, well!” remarked the regimental commander. “Still, one
he understood his commander’s wish.
The regimental commander sought out Dólokhov in the ranks and, reining
“Well, that’s all right,” continued the regimental commander. “A
could hear. “I thank you all! God be praised!” and he rode past that
company and overtook the next one.
regimental commander was nicknamed King of Hearts).
“No, friend, he is sharper-eyed than you are. Boots and leg bands...
and are drawn along.”
drummer, their leader, turned round facing the singers, and flourishing
words: “Morning dawned, the sun was rising,” and concluding: “On
been composed in the Turkish campaign and now being sung in Austria, the
Having jerked out these last words as soldiers do and waved his arms
as if flinging something to the ground, the drummer—a lean, handsome
soldier of forty—looked sternly at the singers and screwed up his
object above his head and, holding it there for some seconds, suddenly
flung it down and began:
“Oh, my bower new...!” chimed in twenty voices, and the castanet
and, walking backwards before the company, jerked his shoulders and
swinging their arms and keeping time spontaneously, marched with long
and the tramp of horses’ hoofs were heard. Kutúzov and his suite were
returning to the town. The commander in chief made a sign that the
men should continue to march at ease, and he and all his suite showed
pleasure at the sound of the singing and the sight of the dancing
soldier and the gay and smartly marching men. In the second file
marching with particular grace and boldness in time to the song and
suite who had mimicked the regimental commander, fell back from the
carriage and rode up to Dólokhov.
private and had not seen fit to recognize him. But now that Kutúzov had
The lively song gave a special flavor to the tone of free and easy
gaiety with which Zherkóv spoke, and to the intentional coldness of
song, arousing an involuntary sensation of courage and cheerfulness.
“I’m glad,” answered Dólokhov briefly and clearly, as the song
demanded.
“I say, come round some evening and we’ll have a game of faro!”
“I can’t. I’ve sworn not to. I won’t drink and won’t play till
        To my native land...”
past the company, and overtook the carriage, still keeping time to the
his private room and, calling his adjutant, asked for some papers
relating to the condition of the troops on their arrival, and the
letters that had come from the Archduke Ferdinand, who was in command of
required papers. Kutúzov and the Austrian member of the Hofkriegsrath
exclamation he was asking the adjutant to wait, and he went on with the
of expression and intonation that obliged one to listen to each
personally it would be a pleasure to hand over the supreme command
of the army into the hands of a better informed and more skillful
general—of whom Austria has so many—and to lay down all this heavy
liberty not to believe me and I don’t even care whether you do or
“On the contrary,” he said, in a querulous and angry tone that
Russian troops and their commander of the laurels they have been
“But that is my conviction, and judging by the last letter with which
His Highness the Archduke Ferdinand has honored me, I imagine that the
Mack, have by now already gained a decisive victory and no longer need
that were afloat, and so Kutúzov’s suggestion of an Austrian victory
sounded much like irony. But Kutúzov went on blandly smiling with the
informed him of a victory and stated strategically the position of the
“Please have a look at it”—and Kutúzov with an ironical smile
following passage, in German, from the Archduke Ferdinand’s letter:
We have fully concentrated forces of nearly seventy thousand men with
which to attack and defeat the enemy should he cross the Lech. Also,
commanding both sides of the Danube, so that should the enemy not
of communications, recross the river lower down, and frustrate his
Russian army will be fully equipped, and shall then, in conjunction with
Kutúzov sighed deeply on finishing this paragraph and looked at the
member of the Hofkriegsrath mildly and attentively.
with jests and to come to business. He involuntarily looked round at the
reports from our scouts. Here are two letters from Count Nostitz and
here is one from His Highness the Archduke Ferdinand and here are
these,” he said, handing him several papers, “make a neat memorandum
movements of the Austrian army, and then give it to his excellency.”
liked to tell him. He gathered up the papers and with a bow to both,
stepped softly over the carpet and went out into the waiting room.
affected languor and indolence. He now looked like a man who has time
agreeable and interesting work. His face expressed more satisfaction
with himself and those around him, his smile and glance were brighter
and more attractive.
Kutúzov, whom he had overtaken in Poland, had received him very kindly,
and had taken him to Vienna and given him the more serious commissions.
firmness, and expedition. I consider myself fortunate to have such a
On Kutúzov’s staff, among his fellow officers and in the army
different from themselves and from everyone else, expected great things
of him, listened to him, admired, and imitated him, and with them Prince
Andrew was natural and pleasant. Others, the majority, disliked him and
considered him conceited, cold, and disagreeable. But among these people
Prince Andrew knew how to take his stand so that they respected and even
his hand Prince Andrew came up to his comrade, the aide-de-camp on duty,
“I am ordered to write a memorandum explaining why we are not
order of Maria Theresa on his neck and a black bandage round his head,
“Commander in Chief Kutúzov?” said the newly arrived general
speaking quickly with a harsh German accent, looking to both sides and
“The commander in chief is engaged,” said Kozlóvski, going
hurriedly up to the unknown general and blocking his way to the door.
“The commander in chief is engaged,” repeated Kozlóvski calmly.
The general’s face clouded, his lips quivered and trembled. He took
leaf, gave it to Kozlóvski, stepped quickly to the window, and threw
immediately broke off. The door of the private room opened and Kutúzov
appeared in the doorway. The general with the bandaged head bent forward
as though running away from some danger, and, making long, quick strides
and his forehead became smooth again, he bowed his head respectfully,
closed his eyes, silently let Mack enter his room before him, and closed
and that the whole army had surrendered at Ulm proved to be correct.
lay in the general progress of the war. When he saw Mack and heard the
understood all the difficulties of the Russian army’s position, and
vividly imagined what awaited it and the part he would have to
humiliation of arrogant Austria and that in a week’s time he might,
perhaps, see and take part in the first Russian encounter with the
might outweigh all the courage of the Russian troops, and at the same
Excited and irritated by these thoughts Prince Andrew went toward his
he met Nesvítski, with whom he shared a room, and the wag Zherkóv;
pale face and glittering eyes.
Just as Prince Andrew met Nesvítski and Zherkóv, there came toward
army, and the member of the Hofkriegsrath who had arrived the previous
“They’re coming!... they’re coming!... Stand aside, make way,
“Your excellency,” said he in German, stepping forward and
He bowed his head and scraped first with one foot and then with the
The general frowned, turned away, and went on.
Bolkónski, turning still paler, pushed him away with an angry look and
of Mack, the news of his defeat, and the thought of what lay before the
Nesvítski and Zherkóv were so surprised by this outburst that they
and taking Nesvítski’s arm he left Zherkóv, who did not know what to
“What’s the matter?” exclaimed Prince Andrew standing still in
his excitement. “Don’t you understand that either we are officers
serving our Tsar and our country, rejoicing in the successes and
     * “Forty thousand men massacred and the army of our allies
     destroyed, and you find that a cause for jesting!”
and went out of the corridor.
assigned to cavalry-captain Denísov, the squadron commander, known
ever since he had overtaken the regiment in Poland, had lived with the
squadron commander.
part from his horse, and at last sprang down and called to his orderly.
headlong to the horse. “Walk him up and down, my dear fellow,” he
“Mind, walk him up and down well!”
evident that the cadet was liberal with his tips and that it paid to
serve him. Rostóv patted the horse’s neck and then his flank, and
“Splendid! What a horse he will be!” he thought with a smile, and
porch. His landlord, who in a waistcoat and a pointed cap, pitchfork in
hand, was clearing manure from the cowhouse, looked out, and his face
Kaiser Alexander hoch!” *(2) said he, quoting words often repeated by
the German landlord.
     Hurrah for Emperor Alexander!”
The German laughed, came out of the cowshed, pulled off his cap, and
Rostóv waved his cap above his head like the German and cried laughing,
reason for rejoicing, they looked at each other with joyful delight and
and parted smiling, the German returning to his cowshed and Rostóv
brag about it, but if he stays out till morning it means he’s lost and
said he. “Now for trouble!” Rostóv looked out of the window and
sparkling black eyes, and black tousled mustache and hair. He wore an
unfastened cloak, wide breeches hanging down in creases, and a crumpled
“Lavwúska!” he shouted loudly and angrily, “take it off,
and have seen Fräulein Mathilde.”
luck! Such ill luck. As soon as you left, it began and went on. Hullo
Puckering up his face though smiling, and showing his short strong
teeth, he began with stubby fingers of both hands to ruffle up his thick
“the rat”) he said, rubbing his forehead and whole face with both
hands. “Just fancy, he didn’t let me win a single cahd, not one
fist, and tapped it on the floor, making the sparks fly, while he
“He lets one win the singles and collahs it as soon as one doubles it;
gives the singles and snatches the doubles!”
He scattered the burning tobacco, smashed the pipe, and threw it away.
Then he remained silent for a while, and all at once looked cheerfully
boots and the clinking of spurs that came to a stop, and a respectful
“Wostóv, deah fellow, just see how much there is left and shove the
purse undah the pillow,” he said, and went out to the quartermaster.
Rostóv took the money and, mechanically arranging the old and new coins
voice, and Lieutenant Telyánin, a small officer of the same squadron,
Rostóv thrust the purse under the pillow and shook the damp little hand
regiment but was not liked; Rostóv especially detested him and was
face; his eyes continually wandered from one object to another.
and show you what kind of rivet to use.”
Telyánin, and he went out to give the order.
Denísov screwed up his face and pointing over his shoulder with his
thumb to the room where Telyánin was sitting, he frowned and gave a
what’s one to do?” and, having given his order, he returned to
left him, rubbing his small white hands.
and looking carelessly about him.
They went through the porch and into the stable. The lieutenant
explained how to rivet the hoof and went away to his own quarters.
When Rostóv went back there was a bottle of vodka and a sausage on the
paper. He looked gloomily in Rostóv’s face and said: “I am witing
He leaned his elbows on the table with his pen in his hand and,
are childwen of the dust... but one falls in love and one is a God, one
Denísov frowned and was about to shout some reply but stopped.
“Seven new and three old imperials.”
“Oh, it’s wetched! Well, what are you standing there for, you
pillows one at a time and shaking them.
He pulled off the quilt and shook it. The purse was not there.
“You’re always like that; you thwow a thing down anywhere and forget
Lavrúshka turned all the bedding over, looked under the bed and under
the table, searched everywhere, and stood still in the middle of the
room. Denísov silently watched Lavrúshka’s movements, and when the
Rostóv felt Denísov’s gaze fixed on him, raised his eyes, and
somewhere below his throat rushed to his face and eyes. He could not
“And there hasn’t been anyone in the room except the lieutenant and
“Now then, you devil’s puppet, look alive and hunt for it!”
shouted Denísov, suddenly, turning purple and rushing at the man with
on his saber, and put on his cap.
orderly by the shoulders and knocking him against the wall.
a moment, and, evidently understanding what Rostóv hinted at, seized
“Nonsense!” he cried, and the veins on his forehead and neck stood
The purse is here! I’ll flay this scoundwel alive, and it will be
and went to the door.
But Rostóv pulled away his arm and, with as much anger as though
“Do you understand what you’re saying?” he said in a trembling
He could not finish, and ran out of the room.
“Ah, may the devil take you and evewybody,” were the last words
The headquarters were situated two miles away from Salzeneck, and
Rostóv, without returning home, took a horse and rode there. There was
it and saw Telyánin’s horse at the porch.
sausages and a bottle of wine.
“Ah, you’ve come here too, young man!” he said, smiling and
word; and he sat down at the nearest table.
Both were silent. There were two Germans and a Russian officer in the
room. No one spoke and the only sounds heard were the clatter of knives
and the munching of the lieutenant.
purse and, drawing its rings aside with his small, white, turned-up
fingers, drew out a gold imperial, and lifting his eyebrows gave it to
The coin was a new one. Rostóv rose and went up to Telyánin.
With shifting eyes but eyebrows still raised, Telyánin handed him the
pale, and added, “Look at it, young man.”
Rostóv took the purse in his hand, examined it and the money in it, and
and suddenly seemed to grow very merry.
He stretched out his hand to take hold of the purse. Rostóv let go of
it. Telyánin took the purse and began carelessly slipping it into the
pocket of his riding breeches, with his eyebrows lifted and his mouth
pocket and that’s quite simple and is no one else’s business.”
“Well, young man?” he said with a sigh, and from under his lifted
Rostóv’s and back, and back again and again in an instant.
“Come here,” said Rostóv, catching hold of Telyánin’s arm and
But these words came like a piteous, despairing cry and an entreaty for
fell from him. He was glad, and at the same instant began to pity the
Telyánin, taking up his cap and moving toward a small empty room. “We
“I know it and shall prove it,” said Rostóv.
to Rostóv’s face, and his sobs were audible.
take it...” He threw it on the table. “I have an old father and
Rostóv took the money, avoiding Telyánin’s eyes, and went out of the
room without a word. But at the door he stopped and then retraced his
take the money,” and he threw the purse to him and ran out of the inn.
said a tall, grizzly-haired staff captain, with enormous mustaches and
affairs of honor and had twice regained his commission.
me I lied, and I told him he lied. And there it rests. He may keep me
me apologize, because if he, as commander of this regiment, thinks it
“You just wait a moment, my dear fellow, and listen,” interrupted
one would not need finesse; and he tells me that I am lying—so let him
demand satisfaction of his regimental commander?”
Denísov sat gloomily biting his mustache and listening to the
officers,” continued the staff captain, “and Bogdánich” (the
“Well, have it so, and you talked a lot of nonsense to him and must
“I did not expect this of you,” said the staff captain seriously and
The case is this: you ought to have thought the matter over and
taken advice; but no, you go and blurt it all straight out before the
officers. Now what was the colonel to do? Have the officer tried and
It’s not pleasant, but what’s to be done, my dear fellow? You landed
conceit prevents your apologizing, and you wish to make the whole
apologize to an old and honorable officer? Whatever Bogdánich may
be, anyway he is an honorable and brave old colonel! You’re quick at
regiment next to no time, my lad, you’re here today and tomorrow
you’ll be appointed adjutant somewhere and can snap your fingers when
Denísov remained silent and did not move, but occasionally looked with
“You value your own pride and don’t wish to apologize,” continued
the staff captain, “but we old fellows, who have grown up in and, God
regiment, and Bogdánich knows it. Oh, we do prize it, old fellow! And
And the staff captain rose and turned away from Rostóv.
Rostóv, growing red and pale alternately, looked first at one officer
and then at the other.
“No, gentlemen, no... you mustn’t think... I quite understand.
the regiment I’d... Ah well, I’ll show that in action, and for me
round and clapping Rostóv on the shoulder with his big hand.
“Go and apologize, your excellency. Yes, go!”
can’t, do what you will! How can I go and apologize like a little boy
“It’ll be worse for you. Bogdánich is vindictive and you’ll pay
“What? Saw the real Mack? With hands and feet?”
The regimental adjutant came in and confirmed the news brought by
the rivers Inn (at Braunau) and Traun (near Linz). On October 23 the
baggage train, the artillery, and columns of troops were defiling
bridge was at times veiled by a diaphanous curtain of slanting rain, and
cathedral, and its bridge, on both sides of which streamed jostling
masses of Russian troops. At the bend of the Danube, vessels, an island,
and a castle with a park surrounded by the waters of the confluence of
the Enns and the Danube became visible, and the rocky left bank of the
treetops and bluish gorges. The turrets of a convent stood out beyond a
wild virgin pine forest, and far away on the other side of the Enns the
Among the field guns on the brow of the hill the general in command of
the rearguard by the commander in chief, was sitting on the trail of a
gun carriage. A Cossack who accompanied him had handed him a knapsack
and a flask, and Nesvítski was treating some officers to pies and real
place! We passed close to the park and saw two deer... and what a
another pie but felt shy, and therefore pretended to be examining the
added he, munching a pie in his moist-lipped handsome mouth, “would be
He pointed with a smile to a turreted nunnery, and his eyes narrowed and
Meanwhile the staff officer standing in front pointed out something to
field glass and shrugging his shoulders, “so it is! They’ll be fired
On the opposite side the enemy could be seen by the naked eye, and from
a shot, and our troops could be seen hurrying to the crossing.
Nesvítski rose, puffing, and went up to the general, smiling.
“Yes, please do,” answered the general, and he repeated the order
that had already once been given in detail: “and tell the hussars
that they are to cross last and to fire the bridge as I ordered; and the
and flask, and swung his heavy person easily into the saddle.
watched him smilingly, and he rode off by the winding path down the
“Crew, to your guns!” commanded the officer.
In a moment the men came running gaily from their campfires and began
“One!” came the command.
metallic roar, and a whistling grenade flew above the heads of our
troops below the hill and fell far short of the enemy, a little smoke
The faces of officers and men brightened up at the sound. Everyone got
up and began watching the movements of our troops below, as plainly
visible as if but a stone’s throw away, and the movements of the
out from behind the clouds, and the clear sound of the solitary shot
and the brilliance of the bright sunshine merged in a single joyous and
alighted from his horse and whose big body was jammed against the
Nesvítski tried to move on, soldiers and carts pushed him back again
and pressed him against the railings, and all he could do was to smile.
crowded together close to his wheels and his horses. “What a fellow!
But the convoyman took no notice of the word “general” and shouted
little waves of the Enns, which rippling and eddying round the piles of
knapsacks, bayonets, long muskets, and, under the shakos, faces with
broad cheekbones, sunken cheeks, and listless tired expressions, and
white foam on the waves of the Enns, an officer, in a cloak and with
and sometimes like a log floating down the river, an officers’ or
company’s baggage wagon, piled high, leather covered, and hemmed in on
with a wink, and passed on followed by another, an old man.
That soldier passed on, and after him came another sitting on a cart.
“Where the devil have the leg bands been shoved to?” said an
orderly, running behind the cart and fumbling in the back of it.
“Bah! How they scurry. He just sends a ball and they think they’ll
all be killed,” a sergeant was saying angrily and reproachfully.
before. It was a German cart with a pair of horses led by a German, and
baby, an old woman, and a healthy German girl with bright red cheeks
turned toward the women, and while the vehicle was passing at foot pace
who, angry and frightened, strode energetically along with downcast
apple, also half smiling as he looked at the handsome girl.
The German closed his eyes, signifying that he did not understand.
The girl smiled and took it. Nesvítski like the rest of the men on the
kind of talk, and at last all stopped. As often happens, the horses of
a convoy wagon became restive at the end of the bridge, and the whole
at one another, and all pressed toward the exit from the bridge.
With great difficulty he managed to get to his horse, and shouting
for him, but again pressed on him so that they jammed his leg, and those
Nesvítski looked round and saw, some fifteen paces away but separated
by the living mass of moving infantry, Váska Denísov, red and shaggy,
with his cap on the back of his black head and a cloak hanging jauntily
whites glittering and rolling as he waved his sheathed saber in a small
bare hand as red as his face.
white teeth fiercely and spurring his black thoroughbred Arab, which
twitched its ears as the bayonets touched it, and snorted, spurting
hoofs, and apparently ready to jump over the railings had his rider let
scabbard and flourishing it.
The soldiers crowded against one another with terrified faces, and
Denísov. “They keep dwagging the wegiment to and fwo all day. If they
“What a dandy you are today!” said Nesvítski, looking at
Denísov’s new cloak and saddlecloth.
Denísov smiled, took out of his sabretache a handkerchief that diffused
a smell of perfume, and put it to Nesvítski’s nose.
and scented myself.”
The imposing figure of Nesvítski followed by his Cossack, and
the determination of Denísov who flourished his sword and shouted
to the farther side of the bridge and stopped the infantry. Beside the
and having done this he rode back.
Carelessly holding in his stallion that was neighing and pawing the
resounded on the planks of the bridge, and the squadron, officers in
front and men four abreast, spread across the bridge and began to emerge
trampled mud and gazed with that particular feeling of ill-will,
estrangement, and ridicule with which troops of different arms usually
the baggage wagons had all crossed, the crush was less, and the last
At the foot of the hill lay wasteland over which a few groups of our
ground, artillery and troops in blue uniform were seen. These were the
the officers and men of Denísov’s squadron, though they tried to talk
of other things and to look in other directions, thought only of what
was there on the hilltop, and kept constantly looking at the patches
The weather had cleared again since noon and the sun was descending
brightly upon the Danube and the dark hills around it. It was calm, and
at intervals the bugle calls and the shouts of the enemy could be heard
from the hill. There was no one now between the squadron and the enemy
yards was all that separated them. The enemy ceased firing, and that
stern, threatening, inaccessible, and intangible line which separates
the living from the dead lies uncertainty, suffering, and death. And
and yet long to cross that line, and know that sooner or later it must
be crossed and you will have to find out what is there, just as you will
strong, healthy, cheerful, and excited, and are surrounded by other such
excitedly animated and healthy men.” So thinks, or at any rate
feels, anyone who comes in sight of the enemy, and that feeling gives
a particular glamour and glad keenness of impression to everything that
and a ball flew whistling over the heads of the hussar squadron. The
officers who had been standing together rode off to their places. The
squadron. All were looking at the enemy in front and at the squadron
commander, awaiting the word of command. A second and a third cannon
with rapid rhythmic whistle flew over the heads of the horsemen and fell
of each shot, as at the word of command, the whole squadron with its
ball flew past, rose in the stirrups and sank back again. The soldiers
bugler, showed one common expression of conflict, irritation, and
excitement, around chin and mouth. The quartermaster frowned, looking
Rook—a handsome horse despite its game leg—had the happy air of a
indication of something new and stern showed round the mouth.
The black, hairy, snub-nosed face of Váska Denísov, and his whole
short sturdy figure with the sinewy hairy hand and stumpy fingers in
good horse, Bedouin, and sitting as though falling backwards in the
saddle, he galloped to the other flank of the squadron and shouted in
felt perfectly happy. Just then the commander appeared on the bridge.
The squadron crossed the bridge and drew out of range of fire without
line followed them across and the last Cossacks quitted the farther side
up to Denísov’s squadron and rode at a footpace not far from Rostóv,
that he was at the front and in the power of a man toward whom he now
colonel’s athletic back, his nape covered with light hair, and his red
to notice him, and that his whole aim now was to test the cadet’s
courage, so he drew himself up and looked around him merrily; then it
after the attack, Bogdánich would come up to him as he lay wounded and
would magnanimously extend the hand of reconciliation.
could get more rewards by doing nothing on the staff, and had succeeded
came to his former chief with an order from the commander of the rear
gloomy gravity and glancing round at his comrades, “there is an order
to stop and fire the bridge.”
serious tone, “but the prince told me to ‘go and tell the colonel
that the hussars must return quickly and fire the bridge.’”
to fire the bridge, and now someone has gone and blundered; they are all
beside themselves over there and one can’t make anything out.”
The colonel deliberately stopped the regiment and turned to Nesvítski.
cap and smoothing his hair wet with perspiration with his plump hand,
“I am not your ‘dear sir,’ Mr. Staff Officer, and you did not tell
me to burn the bridge! I know the service, and it is my habit orders
hand. “How did you get here?” said he, turning to Zherkóv.
staff officer, and at Zherkóv, and he frowned.
for everything, the colonel moved forward and ordered the second
wishes to test me!” His heart contracted and the blood rushed to his
conjecture, but the colonel did not once glance at Rostóv, and looked
as he always did when at the front, solemn and stern. Then came the word
of command.
Their sabers catching in the bridles and their spurs jingling, the
that his heart stood still. His hand trembled as he gave his horse into
an orderly’s charge, and he felt the blood rush to his heart with
a thud. Denísov rode past him, leaning back and shouting something.
catching and their sabers clattering.
and fell on his hands. The others outstripped him.
Rostóv wiping his muddy hands on his breeches looked at his enemy and
back, Cadet!” he cried angrily; and turning to Denísov, who, showing
Meanwhile Nesvítski, Zherkóv, and the officer of the suite were
standing together out of range of the shots, watching, now the small
and blue riding breeches, who were swarming near the bridge, and then at
uniforms and groups with horses, easily recognizable as artillery.
get there and fire the bridge or will the French get within grapeshot
range and wipe them out?” These were the questions each man of the
with a sinking heart—watching the bridge and the hussars in the bright
evening light and the blue tunics advancing from the other side with
their bayonets and guns.
Vladímir medal and ribbon? But now, even if they do get peppered, the
squadron may be recommended for honors and he may get a ribbon. Our
and hurriedly removed.
appeared, then a second and a third almost simultaneously, and at the
reports one after another, and a third.
but at irregular intervals, and grapeshot cracked and rattled onto the
setting it on fire and the French batteries were now firing at them, no
longer to hinder them but because the guns were trained and there was
got back to their horses. Two were misdirected and the shot went too
high, but the last round fell in the midst of a group of hussars and
rattle on the bridge as if nuts were being spilt, and the hussar nearest
hussar and began lifting him.
still he was lifted and laid on the stretcher.
Nicholas Rostóv turned away and, as if searching for something, gazed
into the distance, at the waters of the Danube, at the sky, and at the
sun. How beautiful the sky looked; how blue, how calm, and how deep!
How bright and glorious was the setting sun! With what soft glitter the
blue mountains beyond the river, the nunnery, the mysterious gorges, and
and happiness... “I should wish for nothing else, nothing, if only I
were there,” thought Rostóv. “In myself alone and in that sunshine
there is so much happiness; but here... groans, suffering, fear, and
this uncertainty and hurry... There—they are shouting again, and
again are all running back somewhere, and I shall run with them, and it,
death, is here above me and around... Another instant and I shall never
At that instant the sun began to hide behind the clouds, and other
stretchers came into view before Rostóv. And the fear of death and of
the stretchers, and love of the sun and of life, all merged into one
“O Lord God! Thou who art in that heaven, save, forgive, and protect
sounded louder and calmer, the stretchers disappeared from sight.
Rostóv, and sighing deeply he took Rook, his horse, which stood resting
one foot, from the orderly and began to mount.
“Yes and no mistake!” cried Denísov. “You worked like wegular
bwicks and it’s nasty work! An attack’s pleasant work! Hacking
of the colonel, Nesvítski, Zherkóv, and the officer from the suite.
triumphantly and gaily.
wounded, and one knocked out,” he added, unable to restrain a happy
smile, and pronouncing the phrase “knocked out” with ringing
Pursued by the French army of a hundred thousand men under the command
and compelled to act under conditions of war unlike anything that had
been foreseen, the Russian army of thirty-five thousand men commanded
overtaken by the enemy and fighting rearguard actions only as far as
There had been actions at Lambach, Amstetten, and Melk; but despite the
courage and endurance—acknowledged even by the enemy—with which the
rapid retreat. Austrian troops that had escaped capture at Ulm and had
joined Kutúzov at Braunau now separated from the Russian army, and
Kutúzov was left with only his own weak and exhausted forces. The
modern science of strategics, had been handed to Kutúzov when he was in
Vienna by the Austrian Hofkriegsrath, the sole and almost unattainable
left bank of the Danube and took up a position for the first time
with the river between himself and the main body of the French. On the
and broke it up. In this action for the first time trophies were taken:
banners, cannon, and two enemy generals. For the first time, after a
fortnight’s retreat, the Russian troops had halted and after a fight
troops were ill-clad, exhausted, and had lost a third of their number
in killed, wounded, sick, and stragglers; though a number of sick and
wounded had been abandoned on the other side of the Danube with a letter
in which Kutúzov entrusted them to the humanity of the enemy; and
though the big hospitals and the houses in Krems converted into military
hospitals could no longer accommodate all the sick and wounded, yet the
stand made at Krems and the victory over Mortier raised the spirits of
the army considerably. Throughout the whole army and at headquarters
of columns from Russia, of some victory gained by the Austrians, and of
wounded under him and his own arm slightly grazed by a bullet. As a mark
of the commander in chief’s special favor he was sent with the news of
very muscular men, and on the night of the battle, having arrived
given him by the commander in chief and his fellow officers, Prince
wheels and the sensation of victory. Then he began to imagine that
the Russians were running away and that he himself was killed, but he
again recalled all the details of the victory and his own calm courage
during the battle, and feeling reassured he dozed off.... The dark
thawing in the sunshine, the horses galloped quickly, and on both sides
of the road were forests of different kinds, fields, and villages.
cart, shouting and scolding a soldier with coarse abuse. In each of
the long German carts six or more pale, dirty, bandaged men were being
Prince Andrew told his driver to stop, and asked a soldier in what
answered the soldier. Prince Andrew took out his purse and gave the
“Good news!... Go on!” he shouted to the driver, and they galloped
streets of Brünn and found himself surrounded by high buildings, the
lights of shops, houses, and street lamps, fine carriages, and all that
atmosphere of a large and active town which is always so attractive to a
soldier after camp life. Despite his rapid journey and sleepless night,
Prince Andrew when he drove up to the palace felt even more vigorous and
and his thoughts followed one another with extraordinary clearness and
dim, but definite and in the concise form in which he imagined himself
questions that might be put to him and the answers he would give. He
to the palace, however, an official came running out to meet him, and
The adjutant on duty, meeting Prince Andrew, asked him to wait, and went
in to the Minister of War. Five minutes later he returned and bowing
approached the door of the minister’s room. He felt offended, and
the adjutant and the minister. “Away from the smell of powder, they
and making pencil notes on them, and for the first two or three minutes
taking no notice of his arrival. A wax candle stood at each side of the
to the end, without raising his eyes at the opening of the door and the
“Take this and deliver it,” said he to his adjutant, handing him the
papers and still taking no notice of the special messenger.
evenly, and then raised his head. He had an intellectual and distinctive
expression on his face changed in a way evidently deliberate and
He took the dispatch which was addressed to him and began to read it
Having glanced through the dispatch he laid it on the table and looked
and happiness the victory had afforded him had been now left in the
indifferent hands of the Minister of War and the polite adjutant. The
After washing and dressing, Prince Andrew came into the diplomat’s
luxurious study and sat down to the dinner prepared for him. Bilíbin
After his journey and the campaign during which he had been deprived of
all the comforts of cleanliness and all the refinements of life, Prince
Bilíbin was a man of thirty-five, a bachelor, and of the same circle as
of sixteen, had been in Paris and Copenhagen, and now held a rather
important post in Vienna. Both the foreign minister and our ambassador
in Vienna knew him and valued him. He was not one of those many
avoid doing certain things, and speak French. He was one of those,
who, liking work, knew how to do it, and despite his indolence would
prepare a circular, memorandum, or report, skillfully, pointedly, and
but also for his skill in dealing and conversing with those in the
something striking and took part in a conversation only when that was
in the Viennese drawing rooms and often had an influence on matters
looked as clean and well washed as the tips of one’s fingers after a
and his eyebrows were lifted, then his eyebrows would descend and
twinkled and looked out straight.
engagement and his reception by the Minister of War.
“They received me and my news as one receives a dog in a game of
Bilíbin smiled and the wrinkles on his face disappeared.
distance and puckering the skin above his left eye, “malgré la haute
and his one division, and even then Mortier slips through your fingers!
the Minister of War but also his Most August Majesty the Emperor and
He looked straight at Prince Andrew and suddenly unwrinkled his
“I confess I do not understand: perhaps there are diplomatic
out. Mack loses a whole army, the Archduke Ferdinand and the Archduke
Karl give no signs of life and make blunder after blunder. Kutúzov
invincibility of the French, and the Minister of War does not even care
us nice news of a victory by the Archduke Karl or Ferdinand (one
archduke’s as good as another, as you know) and even if it is only
over a fire brigade of Bonaparte’s, that will be another story and
Ferdinand disgraces himself. You abandon Vienna, give up its
and your capital!’ The one general whom we all loved, Schmidt, you
expose to a bullet, and then you congratulate us on the victory! Admit
“Not only occupied, but Bonaparte is at Schönbrunn, and the count,
After the fatigues and impressions of the journey, his reception, and
“and showed me a letter in which the parade of the French in Vienna
your victory is not a matter for great rejoicing and that you can’t be
Prince Andrew, beginning to understand that his news of the battle
the bridge and its celebrated bridgehead and Prince Auersperg? We heard
“Prince Auersperg is on this, on our side of the river, and is
taken and I hope it will not be, for it is mined and orders have been
mountains of Bohemia, and you and your army would have spent a bad
quoting one of his own mots, releasing the wrinkles on his forehead, and
the Emperor Alexander and the King of Prussia in Berlin? If Prussia
joins the Allies, Austria’s hand will be forced and there will be war.
clenching his small hand and striking the table with it, “and what
l’u! * I shall certainly adopt an innovation and call him simply
“This is what I think. Austria has been made a fool of, and she is
taken, and all this for the beaux yeux * of His Sardinian Majesty. And
are being deceived, my instinct tells me of negotiations with France and
When Prince Andrew reached the room prepared for him and lay down in a
clean shirt on the feather bed with its warmed and fragrant pillows, he
Bonaparte’s new triumph, tomorrow’s levee and parade, and the
He closed his eyes, and immediately a sound of cannonading, of musketry
and the rattling of carriage wheels seemed to fill his ears, and now
the French were firing, and he felt his heart palpitating as he rode
and he experienced tenfold the joy of living, as he had not done since
“Yes, that all happened!” he said, and, smiling happily to himself
Austrian adjutant, Bilíbin, and last night’s conversation. Having
animated, and handsome, with his hand bandaged. In the study were four
war or politics but related to high society, to certain women, and to
politeness and to start conversation, they asked him a few questions
about the army and the battle, and then the talk went off into merry
jests and gossip.
appointment to London was a promotion and that he was so to regard it.
you—is that that man suffers, and this Don Juan, wicked fellow, is
Hippolyte, and began looking through a lorgnette at his elevated legs.
Bilíbin and the rest of “ours” burst out laughing in Hippolyte’s
face, and Prince Andrew saw that Hippolyte, of whom—he had to
He sat down beside Hippolyte and wrinkling his forehead began talking
to him about politics. Prince Andrew and the others gathered round these
expressing... as in its last note... you understand... Besides, unless
mouth!” said Bilíbin, and the mop of hair on his head moved with
Everybody laughed, and Hippolyte louder than anyone. He was evidently
distressed, and breathed painfully, but could not restrain the wild
this house and in Brünn itself. I want to entertain him as far as I
and I beg you all to help me. Brünn’s attractions must be shown him.
You can undertake the theater, I society, and you, Hippolyte, of course
dinner,” cried several voices. “We’ll take you in hand.”
that provisions are supplied and the routes indicated,” said Bilíbin,
audiences, but he does not like talking himself and can’t do it, as
been told to, and the Emperor Francis merely looked fixedly into his
face and just nodded to him with his long head. But after it was
Francis received him standing in the middle of the room. Before the
seemed confused and blushed as if not knowing what to say.
“Was Kutúzov well? When had he left Krems?” and so on. The Emperor
five in the afternoon,” replied Bolkónski growing more animated and
he had ready in his mind, of all he knew and had seen. But the Emperor
smiled and interrupted him.
“Three and a half miles, Your Majesty.”
“The French have abandoned the left bank?”
The Emperor thanked Prince Andrew and bowed. Prince Andrew withdrew and
saw friendly looks and heard friendly words. Yesterday’s adjutant
reproached him for not having stayed at the palace, and offered him
his own house. The Minister of War came up and congratulated him on the
archduchess also wished to see him. He did not know whom to answer, and
took him by the shoulder, led him to the window, and began to talk to
the Grand Cross of Maria Theresa, and the whole army received rewards.
Bolkónski was invited everywhere, and had to spend the whole morning
calling on the principal Austrian dignitaries. Between four and five
and his visit to Brünn. At the door he found a vehicle half full of
to provide himself with some books for the campaign, and had spent some
Prince Andrew could not understand.
Auersperg was defending, and the bridge was not blown up: so Murat
is now rushing along the road to Brünn and will be here in a day or
gentlemen, messieurs les maréchaux, * Murat, Lannes, and Belliard,
mount and ride to the bridge. (Observe that all three are Gascons.)
mined and doubly mined and that there are menacing fortifications at its
head and an army of fifteen thousand men has been ordered to blow up
the bridge and not let us cross? But it will please our sovereign the
Emperor Napoleon if we take this bridge, so let us three go and take
it!’ ‘Yes, let’s!’ say the others. And off they go and take the
bridge, cross it, and now with their whole army are on this side of the
Danube, marching on us, you, and your lines of communication.”
“Stop jesting,” said Prince Andrew sadly and seriously. This news
grieved him and yet he was pleased.
the ranks of obscure officers and offer him the first step to fame!
that could save the army, and how he alone would be entrusted with the
These gentlemen ride onto the bridge alone and wave white handkerchiefs;
tête-de-pont. * They spin him a thousand gasconades, saying that
Bonaparte, that they desire to see Prince Auersperg, and so on. The
jokes, sit on the cannon, and meanwhile a French battalion gets to
the water, and approaches the tête-de-pont. At length appears the
Hostilities are ended, we can shake one another’s hand.... The
bewildered him with fine words, and he is so flattered by his rapidly
established intimacy with the French marshals, and so dazzled by the
sight of Murat’s mantle and ostrich plumes, qu’il n’y voit que du
French battalion rushes to the bridgehead, spikes the guns, and the
the mines and blow up the bridge, this sergeant, seeing that the French
stayed his hand. The sergeant, who was evidently wiser than his general,
goes up to Auersperg and says: ‘Prince, you are being deceived, here
true Gascon) and says: ‘I don’t recognize the world-famous Austrian
was a stroke of genius. Prince Auersperg feels his dignity at stake and
     * (2) That their fire gets into his eyes and he forgets that
and the glory that awaited him.
hitherto puckered brow became smooth as a sign of pleasure, and with a
risen and was going toward his room.
Prince Andrew looked inquiringly at him and gave no reply.
the army now that it is in danger. I understand that. Mon cher, it is
side of the question and you will see that your duty, on the contrary,
anything else.... You have not been ordered to return and have not been
dismissed from here; therefore, you can stay and go with us wherever our
ill luck takes us. They say we are going to Olmütz, and Olmütz is a
very decent town. You and I will travel comfortably in my calèche.”
“I am speaking sincerely as a friend! Consider! Where and why are
things,” and the skin over his left temple puckered, “either you
share defeat and disgrace with Kutúzov’s whole army.”
set off to rejoin the army, not knowing where he would find it and
In Brünn everybody attached to the court was packing up, and the heavy
great haste and in the greatest disorder. The road was so obstructed
took a horse and a Cossack from a Cossack commander, and hungry and
commander in chief and of his own luggage. Very sinister reports of the
position of the army reached him as he went along, and the appearance of
and they awoke in him astonishment at the genius of his hero, a feeling
of wounded pride, and a hope of glory. “And should there be nothing
carts, guns, artillery, and again baggage wagons and vehicles of all
kinds overtaking one another and blocking the muddy road, three and
sometimes four abreast. From all sides, behind and before, as far as ear
and gun carriages, the tramp of horses, the crack of whips, shouts, the
urging of horses, and the swearing of soldiers, orderlies, and officers.
flayed, some not, and broken-down carts beside which solitary soldiers
sat waiting for something, and again soldiers straggling from their
returned from them dragging sheep, fowls, hay, and bulging sacks. At
each ascent or descent of the road the crowds were yet denser and the
pushed the guns and wagons themselves. Whips cracked, hoofs slipped,
traces broke, and lungs were strained with shouting. The officers
directing the march rode backward and forward between the carts. Their
voices were but feebly heard amid the uproar and one saw by their faces
Wishing to find out where the commander in chief was, he rode up to
evidently rigged up by soldiers out of any available materials and
looking like something between a cart, a cabriolet, and a calèche.
A soldier was driving, and a woman enveloped in shawls sat behind the
and was just putting his question to a soldier when his attention
the woman’s vehicle for trying to get ahead of others, and the strokes
and, waving her thin arms from under the woolen shawl, cried:
Chasseurs.... They won’t let us pass, we are left behind and have lost
The officer glanced at him, and without replying turned again to the
rage, “who are you? Are you in command here? Eh? I am commander here,
Prince Andrew, his face distorted with fury, rode up to him and raised
The officer flourished his arm and hastily rode away.
doctor’s wife, who was calling him her deliverer, and recalling with
galloped on to the village where he was told that the commander in chief
On reaching the village he dismounted and went to the nearest house,
intending to rest if but for a moment, eat something, and try to sort
out the stinging and tormenting thoughts that confused his mind. “This
is a mob of scoundrels and not an army,” he was thinking as he went
He turned round. Nesvítski’s handsome face looked out of the little
window. Nesvítski, moving his moist lips as he chewed something, and
Entering the house, Prince Andrew saw Nesvítski and another adjutant
had any news. On their familiar faces he read agitation and alarm.
“Where is the commander in chief?” asked Bolkónski.
“Well, is it true that it’s peace and capitulation?” asked
we’re getting it still worse,” said Nesvítski. “But sit down and
He had just remembered his recent encounter with the doctor’s wife and
“What is the commander in chief doing here?” he asked.
abominable, quite abominable!” said Prince Andrew, and he went off to
the house where the commander in chief was.
Passing by Kutúzov’s carriage and the exhausted saddle horses of
house with Prince Bagratión and Weyrother. Weyrother was the Austrian
at Prince Andrew and did not even nod to him.
angrily and disrespectfully at Kozlóvski.
Through the door came the sounds of Kutúzov’s voice, excited and
disrespectful manner of the exhausted clerk, the fact that the clerk and
Kozlóvski were squatting on the floor by a tub so near to the commander
in chief, and from the noisy laughter of the Cossacks holding the
horses near the window, Prince Andrew felt that something important and
Just as he was going to open it the sounds ceased, the door opened, and
Kutúzov with his eagle nose and puffy face appeared in the doorway.
the commander in chief’s one sound eye showed him to be so preoccupied
with thoughts and anxieties as to be oblivious of his presence. He
impassive face of Oriental type, came out after the commander in chief.
loudly, handing Kutúzov an envelope.
“Well, good-by, Prince,” said he to Bagratión. “My blessing, and
His face suddenly softened and tears came into his eyes. With his left
hand he drew Bagratión toward him, and with his right, on which he wore
“Christ be with you!” Kutúzov repeated and went toward his
“Get in,” said Kutúzov, and noticing that Bolkónski still delayed,
They got into the carriage and drove for a few minutes in silence.
and involuntarily noticed the carefully washed seams of the scar near
his temple, where an Ismail bullet had pierced his skull, and the empty
saying, and sat plunged in thought. Five minutes later, gently swaying
affair, and about some ladies they both knew.
he commanded was in an almost hopeless position. The spy reported that
Napoleon’s army of one hundred and fifty thousand men would cut him
off completely and surround his exhausted army of forty thousand, and he
to abandon the road connecting him with the troops arriving from Russia,
mountains, defending himself against superior forces of the enemy and
abandoning all hope of a junction with Buxhöwden. If Kutúzov decided
by the French who had crossed the Vienna bridge, and encumbered by his
baggage and transport, having to accept battle on the march against an
from Vienna to Znaim was shorter and better than the road for the
four thousand strong, to the right across the hills from the Krems-Znaim
resting, and to halt facing Vienna with Znaim to his rear, and if he
hungry, ill-shod soldiers, and losing a third of his men as stragglers
before he could reach Znaim. Hence Bagratión with his four thousand
that had placed the Vienna bridge in the hands of the French without
and with this object offered a three days’ truce on condition that
that negotiations for peace were already proceeding, and that he
Murat’s emissary and retired, leaving Bagratión’s division
negotiations and to offer the Russian army the three days’ truce.
a truce and sent his adjutant to Kutúzov to report the offer he had
Bagratión’s exhausted troops some rest, and letting the transport and
if but one stage nearer Znaim. The offer of a truce gave the only, and
to agree to the truce but also to offer terms of capitulation, and
road. Bagratión’s exhausted and hungry detachment, which alone
covered this movement of the transport and of the whole army, had to
and also that Murat’s mistake would very soon be discovered, proved
truce and a capitulation, he detected a ruse and wrote the following
I cannot find words to express to you my displeasure. You command only
my advance guard, and have no right to arrange an armistice without my
the armistice immediately and march on the enemy. Inform him that the
general who signed that capitulation had no right to do so, and that no
army.... You are in a position to seize its baggage and artillery.
escape, and Bagratión’s four thousand men merrily lighted campfires,
dried and warmed themselves, cooked their porridge for the first time
for three days, and not one of them knew or imagined what was in store
Between three and four o’clock in the afternoon Prince Andrew, who
had persisted in his request to Kutúzov, arrived at Grunth and reported
Murat’s detachment and the battle had not yet begun. In Bagratión’s
Bagratión, knowing Bolkónski to be a favorite and trusted adjutant,
received him with distinction and special marks of favor, explaining to
him that there would probably be an engagement that day or the next, and
the rearguard and have an eye on the order of retreat, “which is also
“If he is one of the ordinary little staff dandies sent to earn a
to execute an order. The officer on duty, a handsome, elegantly dressed
seemed to be seeking something, and soldiers dragging doors, benches,
and fencing from the village.
hand. And there,” he pointed to a sutler’s tent, “they crowd in
and sit. This morning I turned them all out and now look, it’s full
again. I must go there, Prince, and scare them a bit. It won’t take a
“Yes, let’s go in and I will get myself a roll and some cheese,”
They dismounted and entered the tent. Several officers, with flushed and
weary faces, were sitting at the table eating and drinking.
Captain,” and he turned to a thin, dirty little artillery officer who
sounded and you’ll be in a pretty position without your boots!” (The
you, all!” he added in a tone of command.
Túshin, who silent and smiling, shifting from one stockinged foot to
jest was unacceptable and had not come off. He grew confused.
The staff officer and Prince Andrew mounted their horses and rode on.
Having ridden beyond the village, continually meeting and overtaking
soldiers and officers of various regiments, they saw on their left some
bank by unseen hands. Prince Andrew and the officer rode up, looked at
the entrenchment, and went on again. Just behind it they came upon some
entrenchment. They had to hold their noses and put their horses to a
seen. Prince Andrew stopped and began examining the position.
The staff officer remained behind and Prince Andrew rode on alone.
The farther forward and nearer the enemy he went, the more orderly and
cheerful were the troops. The greatest disorder and depression had been
miles away from the French. At Grunth also some apprehension and alarm
their greatcoats were ranged in lines, the sergeants major and company
the ribs and telling him to hold his hand up. Soldiers scattered over
the whole place were dragging logs and brushwood and were building
shelters with merry chatter and laughter; around the fires sat others,
dressed and undressed, drying their shirts and leg bands or mending
boots or overcoats and crowding round the boilers and porridge cookers.
In one company dinner was ready, and the soldiers were gazing eagerly
emptied them, rolling the vodka in their mouths, and walked away from
the sergeant major with brightened expressions, licking their lips and
encampment, and not within sight of the enemy before an action in
chasseur regiment and in the lines of the Kiev grenadiers—fine fellows
commander, higher than and different from the others, Prince Andrew came
soldiers held him while two others were flourishing their switches and
A stout major was pacing up and down the line, and regardless of the
honorable, and brave, but if he robs his fellows there is no honor in
So the swishing sound of the strokes, and the desperate but unnatural
A young officer with a bewildered and pained expression on his face
stepped away from the man and looked round inquiringly at the adjutant
line and that of the enemy were far apart on the right and left flanks,
another’s faces and speak to one another. Besides the soldiers who
who, jesting and laughing, stared at their strange foreign enemies.
no longer looked at the French but paid attention to the sight-seers and
Russian musketeer who had gone up to the picket line with an officer and
was rapidly and excitedly talking to a French grenadier. “Hark to him
“Wait a bit and listen. It’s fine!” answered Sídorov, who was
recognized him and stopped to listen to what he was saying. Dólokhov
“Now then, go on, go on!” incited the officer, bending forward and
trying to prove that the Russians had surrendered and had fled all
“We have orders to drive you off here, and we shall drive you off,”
“Only take care you and your Cossacks are not all captured!” said
The French onlookers and listeners laughed.
And Dólokhov swore at him in coarse soldier’s Russian and shouldering
Sídorov, turning to the French, winked, and began to jabber meaningless
and good-humored laughter from the soldiers that it infected the French
to unload the muskets, explode the ammunition, and all return home as
But the guns remained loaded, the loopholes in blockhouses and
entrenchments looked out just as menacingly, and the unlimbered cannon
told him the whole field could be seen. Here he dismounted, and stopped
artillery sentry was pacing up and down; he stood at attention when the
Behind the guns were their limbers and still farther back picket ropes
and artillerymen’s bonfires. To the left, not far from the farthest
It was true that a view over nearly the whole Russian position and the
could be seen, and in three places to left and right the French troops
evidently in the village itself and behind the hill. To the left from
Our infantry were stationed there, and at the farthest point the
dragoons. In the center, where Túshin’s battery stood and from which
Prince Andrew was surveying the position, was the easiest and most
direct descent and ascent to the brook separating us from Schön
wider than ours, and it was plain that they could easily outflank us
on both sides. Behind our position was a steep and deep dip, making it
difficult for artillery and cavalry to retire. Prince Andrew took
out his notebook and, leaning on the cannon, sketched a plan of the
center, and secondly, to withdraw the cavalry to the other side of the
dip. Prince Andrew, being always near the commander in chief, closely
following the mass movements and general orders, and constantly studying
flank,” he said to himself, “the Kiev grenadiers and the Podólsk
on this high ground, shall withdraw the left flank under its cover, and
shed, and its tone was so sincere that he could not but listen.
“No, friend,” said a pleasant and, as it seemed to Prince Andrew, a
very wise, because you can take everything along with you—vodka and
“Well, stand us some of your herb vodka, Túshin,” it said.
He did not finish. Just then there was a whistle in the air; nearer and
nearer, faster and louder, louder and faster, a cannon ball, as if it
and his kind, intelligent face rather pale, rushed out of the shed
motionless masses of the French now swayed and that there really was
The battle had begun! Prince Andrew turned his horse and galloped back
growing louder and more frequent. Evidently our guns had begun to reply.
and Murat, humiliated and anxious to expiate his fault, had at once
moved his forces to attack the center and outflank both the Russian
wings, hoping before evening and before the arrival of the Emperor to
blood rush to his heart. “But where and how will my Toulon present
Passing between the companies that had been eating porridge and drinking
movement of soldiers forming ranks and getting their muskets ready,
and on all their faces he recognized the same eagerness that filled his
the face of each soldier and each officer seemed to say.
The foremost, wearing a Cossack cloak and lambskin cap and riding a
him to come up; Prince Bagratión reined in his horse and recognizing
and wished he could tell what, if anything, this man was thinking
and feeling at that moment. “Is there anything at all behind that
told him, and said, “Very good!” in a tone that seemed to imply that
everything that took place and was reported to him was exactly what he
riding a fine bobtailed horse, and a civilian—an accountant who had
smile of satisfaction and presented a strange appearance among the
hussars, Cossacks, and adjutants, in his camlet coat, as he jolted on
joke, and purposely trying to appear stupider than he really was.
By this time they were all approaching Túshin’s battery, and a ball
ended with a thud into something soft... f-f-flop! and a Cossack, riding
a little to their right and behind the accountant, crashed to earth with
his horse. Zherkóv and the staff officer bent over their saddles and
and examined him with attentive curiosity. The Cossack was dead, but the
Prince Bagratión screwed up his eyes, looked round, and, seeing the
the care of a skillful rider and, slightly bending over, disengaged his
Suvórov giving his saber to Bagratión in Italy, and the recollection
“Whose company?” asked Prince Bagratión of an artilleryman standing
frightened here?” and the artilleryman understood him.
freckled gunner in a merry voice, standing to attention.
“Yes, yes,” muttered Bagratión as if considering something, and he
As he approached, a ringing shot issued from it deafening him and his
suite, and in the smoke that suddenly surrounded the gun they could see
a trembling hand placed a charge in the cannon’s mouth. The short,
carriage, moved forward and, not noticing the general, looked out
shading his eyes with his small hand.
“Lift it two lines more and it will be just right,” cried he in a
Bagratión called to him, and Túshin, raising three fingers to his cap
with a bashful and awkward gesture not at all like a military salute
No one had given Túshin orders where and at what to fire, but after
report, and began deliberately to examine the whole battlefield extended
rivulet flowed, the soul-stirring rolling and crackling of musketry was
heard, and much farther to the right beyond the dragoons, the officer of
without support. Prince Bagratión turned to the officer and with his
officer’s remark was just and that really no answer could be made to
commander of the regiment in the hollow and news that immense masses
of the French were coming down upon them and that his regiment was in
disorder and was retreating upon the Kiev grenadiers. Prince Bagratión
bowed his head in sign of assent and approval. He rode off at a walk to
the right and sent an adjutant to the dragoons with orders to attack the
the commander of the dragoons had already retreated beyond the dip in
the ground, as a heavy fire had been opened on him and he was losing
men uselessly, and so had hastened to throw some sharpshooters into the
As he was leaving the battery, firing was heard on the left also, and
himself, Prince Bagratión sent Zherkóv to tell the general in command
as the right flank would probably not be able to withstand the enemy’s
attack very long. About Túshin and the battalion that had been in
attentively to Bagratión’s colloquies with the commanding officers
and the orders he gave them and, to his surprise, found that no orders
subordinate commanders was done, if not by his direct command, at least
though what happened was due to chance and was independent of the
commander’s will, owing to the tact Bagratión showed, his presence
countenances became calm; soldiers and officers greeted him gaily, grew
more cheerful in his presence, and were evidently anxious to display
bleeding head and no cap was being dragged along by two soldiers who
supported him under the arms. There was a gurgle in his throat and he
groaning aloud and swinging his arm which had just been hurt, while
that moment been wounded and his face showed fear rather than suffering.
Crossing a road they descended a steep incline and saw several men
unwounded. The soldiers were ascending the hill breathing heavily, and
despite the general’s presence were talking loudly and gesticulating.
smoke, and an officer catching sight of Bagratión rushed shouting after
to the ranks along which shots crackled now here and now there, drowning
the sound of voices and the shouts of command. The whole air reeked with
wind to carry away. A pleasant humming and whistling of bullets were
The commander of the regiment, a thin, feeble-looking old man with a
giving him a mild expression, rode up to Bagratión and welcomed him as
been attacked by French cavalry and that, though the attack had been
had happened during that half-hour to the troops entrusted to him, and
of the action balls and shells began flying all over his regiment and
hitting men and that afterwards someone had shouted “Cavalry!” and
hollow and were firing at our men. Prince Bagratión bowed his head as a
sign that this was exactly what he had desired and expected. Turning
expressed the concentrated and happy resolution you see on the face of
eagerly and rather disdainfully, not resting on anything although his
movements were still slow and measured.
The commander of the regiment turned to Prince Bagratión, entreating
from him. “There, you see!” and he drew attention to the bullets
whistling, singing, and hissing continually around them. He spoke in the
tone of entreaty and reproach that a carpenter uses to a gentleman who
your hands.” He spoke as if those bullets could not kill him, and his
he only gave an order to cease firing and re-form, so as to give room
to move from right to left as if drawn by an invisible hand, and the
against them and winding down over the uneven ground. One could already
and see the standard flapping against its staff.
and moved to the right; from behind it, dispersing the laggards, came
a company commander, a fine round-faced man, with a stupid and happy
would appear as he passed the commander.
to his leg a narrow unsheathed sword (small, curved, and not like a real
weapon) and looked now at the superior officers and now back at the men
if all the powers of his soul were concentrated on passing the commander
in the best possible manner, and feeling that he was doing it well he
at each alternate step; and in time to this, with stern but varied
faces, the wall of soldiers burdened with knapsacks and muskets marched
in step, and each one of these hundreds of soldiers seemed to be
left...” A fat major skirted a bush, puffing and falling out of
ball, cleaving the air, flew over the heads of Bagratión and his suite,
and fell into the column to the measure of “Left... left!” “Close
up!” came the company commander’s voice in jaunty tones. The
fallen, and an old trooper on the flank, a noncommissioned officer who
had stopped beside the dead men, ran to catch up his line and, falling
into step with a hop, looked back angrily, and through the ominous
silence and the regular tramp of feet beating the ground in unison, one
fearing to relax, shouted with his mouth wide open and passed on.
The order was given to halt and down knapsacks.
Bagratión rode round the ranks that had marched past him and
dismounted. He gave the reins to a Cossack, took off and handed over his
